Minnesota Department of Health: Protecting, maintaining improving the health of all Minnesotans.
MDH Logo
MDH Home Main Categories About Us Library Northstar
_______________ Search
Health Technology Advisory Committee Home Publications Links Search [space.gif]
Cadavor Donor Pancreas Transplantation for Poorly Controlled Type I Diabetes
July 1996
INTRODUCTION
This report examines cadaver donor pancreas transplantation as a treatment for poorly controlled Type I diabetes^1.
The Health Technology Advisory Committee (HTAC) studied this procedure because of the increased frequency of pancreas transplantation, unknown efficacy or effectiveness^2, and because Type I diabetes has significant health and cost implication.
This report is intended to help patients, their families, health care providers, payers, and Minnesota policy-makers make informed choices and decisions.
Pancreas transplantation has been performed for 30 years, with increasing frequency in recent years due to improved technique, availability of anti-rejection drugs^3, and presumed improvement in outcome for the patient.^4 The total number of pancreas transplants performed in Minnesota from 1987 through March of 1996 was 534, compared to 5,240 for the entire United States.^5 117 institutions, including 2 in Minnesota, performed one or more versions of the procedure through December 1995.
Although not within the scope of this report, emerging technologies such as living-related donor and islet cell^6 transplants are important for future consideration.
TREATMENT FOR TYPE I DIABETES
The generally accepted approach to management of Type I diabetes is the use of insulin to bring the blood glucose level as close to normal as possible^7.
Ideally, this goal is achieved without producing undesirable symptoms, most commonly insulin reactions, which may be life threatening.
The Diabetes Control and Complications Trial (DCCT) demonstrated a team approach to patient care through monitoring HgbA1c^8 levels, measuring multiple blood glucose levels on a daily basis, adjusting frequencies and amounts of insulin injected, and modifying diet and exercise.
If the blood glucose (and HgbA1c) levels or frequency of insulin reactions remain unacceptable after such intensive therapy, an insulin pump may be the next best step.
The DCCT emphasizes that the diabetes cannot be considered poorly controlled until the best conservative care, delivered in proper sequence, has failed.
Only then can pancreas transplant be considered as an option for a Type I diabetic without kidney failure.
FINDINGS
Pancreas transplantation is performed in the following circumstances^9:
1.
Approximately 60% of pancreas transplant patients receive simultaneous pancreas and kidney transplant, performed when the patient has both severe diabetes with significant complications and actual or impending kidney failure.
2.
Slightly more than 20% of pancreas transplant patients receive pancreas transplant after kidney transplant, performed for inadequately controlled diabetes.
3.
Less than 20% of pancreas transplant patients receive pancreas transplant alone, which is done primarily for serious disability related to problems with the day to day treatment of diabetes in the absence of kidney failure.
The clinical indications for and outcomes of the three forms of pancreas transplant vary.
However, in all cases, pancreas transplant is generally not an initial treatment option because of the following:
1.
Risks associated with the surgery and the life-long use of anti-rejection drugs.
2.
Costs of the procedure and of treatment after discharge.
3.
Lack of consensus among clinical experts regarding the effectiveness of the procedure.
4.
Lack of definitive research on the effectiveness of the procedure due to the relatively small number of procedures performed and absence of adequately designed comparative studies.
HTAC reviewed the available scientific literature.
Varied patient selection criteria, paucity of prospective studies, and reliance upon poorly defined "quality of life" measures are limitations of the published literature.
These limitations, in addition to the relatively small number of procedures performed, prevent a definitive research conclusion.
However, several small studies and the expertise of some clinicians suggest that there are situations in which pancreas transplantation may be a viable treatment option for diabetes after conservative treatment has failed.
The difference in total costs for a pancreas transplant versus those of a solitary kidney transplant represents the incremental cost of performing the pancreas transplant procedure.
Using median charges from a hospital in Minnesota to estimate cost, a pancreas transplant, with or without a kidney, costs approximately $28,000 more than a solitary kidney transplant to perform.^10
Only limited data could be found comparing health outcomes and evaluating quality of life between patients on insulin therapy against those of pancreas transplant recipients.^11 Until better information is available, it is not possible to draw conclusions regarding the relative clinical or cost effectiveness of pancreas transplant compared to that of other treatment options.
CONCLUSIONS
In part because pancreas transplantation is not commonly performed, there continues to be a lack of definitive data on the efficacy, effectiveness, and relative costs of care to patients and society associated with the procedure.
Improvement in quality of life after transplantation for patients and their families is also difficult to establish given currently available information.
Cadaver-donor pancreas transplant has moved from the stage of innovation to being considered routine care at some institutions, without consensus on its efficacy or effectiveness.
Patients facing serious disease may expect, and even demand, unproven treatments, resulting in conflicts among patients, providers, and health plans.
Policy makers are then faced with balancing patient expectation against broad societal needs when considering optimal allocation of finite resources for medical care.
RECOMMENDATIONS
In the use of and reimbursement for pancreas transplant, the goal should be to promote:
1.
Adherence to strict patient selection criteria; 2.
Prior patient compliance with conventional therapies; 3.
Participation by both patients and the institutions performing pancreas transplants in cooperative data collection; 4. Use of data collected to expand existing databases such as transplant registries, with special emphasis on patient selection criteria and patient outcomes including quality of life assessments
Improved methods which produce a higher standard of evidence for assessing the value of emerging technologies are needed by providers, health plans, policy-makers and the public for sound decision-making.
Notices announcing publication of this report will be sent to the following organizations and specialty societies: American Academy of Clinical Endocrinology, American College of Endocrinology, American College of Gastroenterology, American College of Surgeons, American Diabetes Association, American Gastroenterological Association, American Society of Internal Medicine, International Diabetes Center, International Diabetes Foundation, National Diabetes Information Clearing House, and the National Institute of Diabetes and Digestive and Kidney Diseases.
In addition, the findings of this report will be submitted to the Minnesota Medical Association's journal, Minnesota Medicine, for publication.
OTHER CONSIDERATIONS
HTAC recognizes that prior patient compliance with conventional therapies for the management of Type I diabetes is one factor affecting the use of and payment for pancreas transplantation.
HTAC also emphasizes the need for sufficient access to the services and supplies required for conventional therapies.
^1 Type I Diabetes is caused by a lack of insulin production in the pancreas, resulting in hyperglycemia (high blood sugar).
^2 Efficacy refers to the outcomes attainable under optimal circumstances, whereas effectiveness refers to outcomes attainable under more general practice conditions.
^3 Anti-rejection drugs, such as, steroids, cortisone, cyclosporin, FK506 decrease the body's response to foreign proteins.
^4 See page 37 in the full body of this report.
^5 From International Pancreas Transplant Registry Data.
Of the 5,240 transplants only 23 were from living-related donors, 22 of which were performed in Minnesota.
^6 Islet cells are specialized insulin-producing cells from the pancreas.
^7 Blood glucose control is maintenance of blood sugar levels between 80-120 mg/dl and HgbA1c below 6%.
^8 HgbA1c is an indicator of consistency of control of blood sugar over a long period of several weeks.
^9 These percentages are Minnesota-specific and will generally vary from estimates for the United States.
^10 See page 83 of the full report.
^11 See page 77 of the full report.
TECHNOLOGY FACT SHEET
Simultaneous Pancreas/Kidney Transplantation (SPK)
Indications for use:
Renal disease (no consensus on degree of renal dysfunction) Mild secondary diabetic complications No prior multiple abdominal surgeries
Applicable populations served:
Type I diabetics with the following characteristics:
* Age of 18 to 50 years * Lack of systemic complications * ABO group compatibility with organ donor * Presence of overt secondary diabetic complications (nephropathy, retinopathy, or neuropathy) * Ability to tolerate surgical procedure and post-transplant immunosuppressive routine Psychiatric stability and strong family support network * Ability to understand investigative nature and risks of procedure
Procedure:
With this procedure, the pancreas and kidney are transplanted at the same time.
The donor kidney is placed in the iliac fossa outside of or behind the peritoneum.
The renal artery of the donor graft is joined end-to-end with the recipient's hypogastric artery or end-to-side with the recipient's common iliac artery.
The renal vein of the graft is then joined with the iliac vein if the recipient is an adult and with the inferior vena cava if the recipient is a child.
Continuity of the urinary tract is established by suturing the donor ureter to the bladder of the recipient.
Foley catheter drains are used for 3 to 5 days.
The recipient's pancreas is not removed unless diseased.
The donor pancreas, either whole or segmental, is placed within the peritoneum or the abdomen.
Blood vessels from the donor pancreas are connected with the iliac vessels.
For managing exocrine drainage, either neoprene or prolamine is injected into the exocrine duct (duct occlusion or polymer injection method) or the duct is connected with the urinary bladder (bladder drainage), the lower part of the small intestine (enteric drainage), or the ureter (ureter drainage).
The bladder-drainage technique is the most commonly used method in the United States.
Number of procedures performed:
In Minnesota from 1987 to 1995: 331
In U.S.A. from 1987 to 1993: 2,600
Outside of USA from 1987 to 1993: 913
Complications/adverse effects:
* Thrombosis 6.30% * Bleeding 0.76% * Infection 2.00% * Anastomotic leak 0.40% * Pancreatitis 1.80% * Total 11.30%
One-year survival:
* Patient 84% to 90% * Kidney 83% to 84% * Pancreas 71% to 79%
Contraindications:
* Absolute contraindications * Significant coronary artery disease * Presence of active infection or malignancy * Active substance abuse or dependence * History of noncompliance * Psychiatric illness * Peptic ulcer * Advanced nephropathy with creatinine clearance of 
TECHNOLOGY FACT SHEET
Pancreas after Kidney Transplantation (PAK)
Indications for use:
Renal disease (no consensus on degree of renal dysfunction)
Mild secondary diabetic complications
No prior multiple abdominal surgeries
Applicable populations served:
Type I diabetics with the following characteristics:
* Age of 18 to 50 years * Lack of systemic complications * ABO group compatibility with organ donor * Presence of overt secondary diabetic complications (nephropathy, retinopathy, or neuropathy) * Ability to tolerate surgical procedure and post-transplant immunosuppressive routine * Psychiatric stability and strong family support network * Ability to understand investigative nature and risks of procedure
Procedure:
This procedure is performed after a prior successful kidney transplantation.
The recipient's pancreas is not removed unless diseased.
The donor pancreas, either whole or segmental, is placed within the peritoneum or the abdomen.
Blood vessels from the donor pancreas are connected with the iliac vessels.
For managing exocrine drainage, either neoprene or prolamine is injected into the exocrine duct (duct occlusion or polymer injection method) or the duct is connected with the urinary bladder (bladder drainage), the lower part of the small intestine (enteric drainage), or the ureter (ureter drainage).
The bladder-drainage technique is the most commonly used method in the United States.
Number of procedures performed:
In Minnesota from 1987 to 1995: 122
In U.S.A. from 1987 to 1993: 242
Outside of U.S.A. from 1987 to 1993: 37
Complications/adverse effects:
* Thrombosis 12.7% * Bleeding 0.98% * Infection 3.90% * Anastomotic leak 0.98% * Pancreatitis 2.90% * Total 21.50%
One-year survival:
Patient 92% to 96%
Pancreas 37% to 48%
Contraindications:
Absolute contraindications
Significant coronary artery disease
Presence of active infection or malignancy
Active substance abuse or dependence
History of noncompliance
Psychiatric illness
Peptic ulcer
Advanced nephropathy with creatinine clearance of 
Obesity
Relative contraindications
Active smoking
Blindness
Peripheral vascular disease
History of soft tissue disease
TECHNOLOGY FACT SHEET
Pancreas Transplantation Alone (PTA)
Indications for use:
Preuremia or nonuremia with propensity toward diabetic complications which are predicted to be worse than the undesirable side effects of immunosuppression
or
Extremely labile diabetes, refractory to any type of exogenous insulin regimen or other therapeutic approach, with severe metabolic complications and incapacitating clinical or emotional problems
Applicable populations served:
Type I diabetics with the following characteristics:
* Age of 18 to 50 years * Lack of systemic complications * ABO group compatibility * Presence of overt secondary diabetic complications (nephropathy, retinopathy, or neuropathy) * Ability to tolerate surgical procedure and post-transplant immunosuppressive routine * Psychiatric stability and strong family support network * Ability to understand investigative nature and risks of procedure
Procedure:
The recipient's pancreas is not removed unless diseased.
The donor pancreas, either whole or segmental, is placed within the peritoneum or the abdomen.
Blood vessels from the donor pancreas are connected with the iliac vessels.
For managing exocrine drainage, either neoprene or prolamine is injected into the exocrine duct (duct occlusion or polymer injection method) or the duct is connected with the urinary bladder (bladder drainage), the lower part of the small intestine (enteric drainage), or the ureter (ureter drainage).
The bladder-drainage technique is the most commonly used method in the United States.
Number of procedures performed:
In Minnesota from 1987 to 1995: 108
In U.S.A. from 1987 to 1993: 181
Outside of U.S.A. from 1987 to 1993: 49
Complications/adverse effects:
* Thrombosis 10.90% * Bleeding 0.70% * Infection 2.00% * Pancreatitis 3.40% * Total 17.00%
One-year survival:
Patient 91% to 100%
Pancreas 26% to 71%
Contraindications:
Absolute contraindications
Significant coronary artery disease
Presence of active infection or malignancy
Active substance abuse or dependence
History of noncompliance
Psychiatric illness
Peptic ulcer
Advanced nephropathy with creatinine clearance of 
Obesity
Relative contraindications
Active smoking
Blindness
Peripheral vascular disease
History of soft tissue disease
TECHNICAL REPORT
Cadaver Donor Pancreas Transplantation for Poorly Conrolled Type I Diabetes
MEDICAL BACKGROUND
Diabetes mellitus is a chronic disorder characterized by impaired metabolism of carbohydrates, protein, and fats.
There are two major forms of the syndrome, insulin-dependent (Type I) and non-insulin-dependent (Type II) diabetes mellitus.
Although onset can occur at any time for Type I diabetes, the emphasis of this report, the peak age of onset is typically 12 years.
Type I diabetes is caused by the lack of insulin production by the beta cells of the islets of Langerhans in the pancreas (Sutherland et al., 1993a) and is associated with viral infections, autoimmune responses, and genetic factors.
This lack of insulin results in protein wasting, production of ketone bodies, and hyperglycemia (excessive sugar in the blood), which leads to excessive urine excretion, excessive sugar excretion in the urine, dehydration, and acidosis accompanied by ketone bodies (ketoacidosis).
Ketoacidosis, if untreated, can lead to nausea and vomiting, stupor, coma, and death.
Symptoms of diabetes include excessive eating, excessive thirst, itching or prickling sensations, lassitude, weight loss, blurred vision, and irritability.
The disorder is also associated with a high incidence of vascular disease involving the small and large blood vessels (micro- and macroangiopathy) from which stem a number of late diabetic complications (Abecassis and Corry, 1993).
Over 50% of the diabetic patients who survive for more than 20 years after diagnosis will experience late complications that affect the eyes (retinopathy), nerves (neuropathy), and/or kidneys (nephropathy) (Sutherland et al., 1993a).
Diabetic retinopathy, which usually occurs between 10 to 20 years following the onset of Type I diabetes, can lead to total blindness within two years if left untreated (Königsrainer et al., 1991a).
In fact, diabetes is the leading cause of blindness in the United States (Zehrer and Gross, 1991).
Moreover, compared with the general population, individuals with diabetes are two times as likely to experience coronary heart disease or stroke, five times as likely to develop gangrene, and 17 times as likely to experience kidney failure (Zerher and Gross, 1991), and the average life-span for diabetics is significantly shorter than that for the general population (Sutherland et al., 1993a).
In addition, diabetes is the third leading cause of death by disease in the United States (Zehrer and Gross, 1991).
Control of carbohydrate metabolism and blood pressure is necessary to prevent the secondary complications of diabetes (Königsrainer et al., 1991a).
It has been proven that the development of neuropathy, retinopathy, and nephropathy depends upon the degree to which glycemia is controlled (Sutherland et al., 1993a), and the administration of exogenous insulin has been the cornerstone of diabetic treatment since its discovery about 70 years ago (Bartucci et al., 1992).
Treatment options include a blend of intensive insulin therapy, diet, exercise, and management of complications.
Recent developments, such as different types of insulin and insulin-delivery systems, as well as home blood glucose monitoring systems, have contributed to an improved clinical state for diabetics, who now can monitor their own blood glucose, meal plan, and level of activity and can make decisions regarding insulin doses during each day to achieve normal, or at least near normal, blood sugar levels (Bartucci et al., 1992).
However, it has been found that exogenous insulin does not perfectly control diabetes, as dose-calculations are not always precise and it is not uncommon for diabetics to experience hypoglycemia (insufficient blood-sugar) from overdosing or ketoacidosis from underdosing.
Only perfect control of blood sugar levels will prevent complications, but a perfect insulin delivery system has yet to be developed (Sutherland et al., 1993a).
The only means of achieving a near physiologic metabolic control without the occurrence of hypoglycemic incidents is pancreas transplantation, which provides a self-regulated source of insulin (Bandello et al., 1991).
Organ transplantation became a clinical reality after the first human kidney transplantation in the 1950s followed by the development of the drug azathioprine and its combined use with the steroid prednisone in the 1960s.
Although kidney transplantation evolved quickly as an effective treatment for end-stage renal disease, patients with diabetes were generally considered as high-risk, therefore ineligible for kidney transplantation.
Because uremic diabetics undergoing dialysis had a high mortality rate, surgeons at the University of Minnesota, considering transplantation the lower risk option when compared with dialysis, initiated not only kidney transplantation but also pancreas and islet transplantation for the treatment of uremia and hyperglycemia in these patients.
Thus, the first human pancreas transplant, using a segment of the pancreas along with simultaneous kidney transplantation, was performed in 1966 at the University of Minnesota center on a diabetic patient.
In this case, as well as in 13 additional pancreas or combined pancreas/kidney transplants performed over the next few years, grafts functioned immediately and patients became insulin-independent; however, all grafts except one were rejected within one year (Sutherland et al., 1993a).
Due to the high incidence of complications related to pancreas transplantation, it was thought by some to be unnecessary to correct diabetes while attempting to correct uremia; thus, in 1968, the first kidney transplant in a diabetic without a simultaneous grafting of the pancreas was performed at the University of Minnesota center, followed by 45 additional kidney transplants in diabetics over the next several years.
The procedure proved to be effective, with graft survival rates similar to those of nondiabetic patients.
This practice has since been adopted worldwide and is performed routinely for treatment of diabetic nephropathy (Sutherland et al., 1993a).
Meanwhile, with improvements in surgical techniques and immunosuppressive regimens, work continued on pancreas transplantation.
By mid-1993, 4,799 pancreas transplants were reported to the International Pancreas Transplant Registry, with over 3000 of these performed in the United States (Sutherland et al., 1994).
Results have been encouraging, with graft survival rates for combined pancreas and kidney transplantation comparable to those of solitary kidney transplantation (American Diabetes Association, 1992b).
Thus, pancreas transplantation is now considered a viable option for the treatment of Type 1 diabetes (Milde et al., 1992).
DESCRIPTION OF PANCREAS TRANSPLANTATION
Objectives
Pancreas transplantation may now be performed alone (PTA) or in combination with a kidney graft, either after successful kidney transplantation (PAK) or simultaneously (SPK).
The main objective of kidney transplantation in diabetics is to ameliorate end-stage kidney disease (Sutherland et al., 1993a).
The primary purpose of pancreas transplantation is to maintain glucose levels in the near-normal range by providing continuous regulation of glucose metabolism with an adequate insulin-producing pancreas.
Additional objectives are to delay, prevent, or reverse the progression of diabetic complications, such as nephropathy, retinopathy, neuropathy, and cardiovascular disease (Boudreaux et al., 1991; Zehrer and Gross, 1991).
However, while it is possible that complete correction of the diabetic state may prevent the development of these secondary complications, complications involving the eyes and nerves are usually far advanced in uremic diabetics and the effects of pancreas transplantation on the course of established diabetic complications have been variable; therefore, it is the overall effect on quality of life that is most important.
Although all transplantation procedures require life-long immunosuppression, which is associated with adverse effects and may influence quality of life, it is a generally accepted concept that compared with patients who are not immunosuppressed but require dialysis or exogenous insulin, those who are immunosuppressed but dialysis-free or insulin-independent experience an improved quality of life (Sutherland, 1994).
Thus, quality of life is considered an important objective for both kidney and pancreas transplantation.
Organ Procurement
Organs may be obtained from a cadaver or from a living related donor in the case of kidney grafts or segmental pancreas grafts.
There are guidelines for the selection of donor organs; however, since there is a scarcity of donor organs, these guidelines are not considered strict requirements and often a balance must be reached between the desire to use only ideal donors and the desire to minimize mortality as prospective recipients wait for organs.
Considerations for organ donation eligibility include (Schwartz et al., 1989):
* ABO blood group compatibility * Lymphocyte cross matching * Travel time between the donor and recipient hospitals * Approximate size matching * Etiology of brain death * Absence of hepatitis B, HTLV-III, and cytomegalovirus
In the case of pancreas transplantation, a history of diabetes mellitus is an absolute contraindication for organ donation.
Organs may be procured from donors up to the age of 60 years, but a thorough evaluation of possible atherosclerosis should be performed in any potential donor over the age of 40 years (Abecassis and Corry, 1993).
Potential cadaver donors must be brain-dead with a beating heart, and organs are harvested in conjunction with multiple organ procurements (Taylor et al., 1994).
Although matching of human leukocyte antigen (HLA) is not considered an absolute requirement for organ donation, it is associated with improved graft survival rates.
In the past, HLA-matching was often not performed due to the time required for testing; however, improved methods of preserving harvested organs now allow storage of the harvested pancreas for up to 30 hours with no detrimental effects, which allows time for HLA-testing.
HLA-matching can also be achieved with a living related donor, but these potential donors run a significant risk of developing diabetes themselves since they are relinquishing up to half of their own islet cells for segmental grafts; therefore, living related donors are not used routinely for pancreas transplantation (Robertson and Sutherland, 1992).
Procedure
The surgical procedure for pancreas transplantation is not standardized.
In addition to some differences in surgical technique for the various recipient categories of transplantation (PTA, PAK, and SPK), the pancreas graft itself may involve use of the whole organ or only parts of the organ (segmental graft), and the graft may be placed within the peritoneum or abdomen.
The managment of exocrine secretions also varies and may be handled by injecting neoprene or prolamine into the exocrine duct (duct occlusion or polymer injection method) or by draining exocrine secretions into the bladder (bladder drainage method), the intestines (enteric drainage method), or the ureter (ureter drainage method).
The bladder-drainage technique is the most widely used method in the United States (Sutherland et al., 1994).
The immunosuppressive approach also varies but tends to follow the protocol for solitary kidney transplantation (Abecassis and Corry, 1993).
Typically, this involves a triple drug regimen using azathioprine, cyclosporin, and steroids or a quadruple drug regimen that uses these same agents but adds either antilymphocyte globulin (ALG), antithymocyte globulin (ATG), or monoclonal antibodies (OKT3).
The most common approach is to administer an anti-T-cell agent, such as OKT3, during the first two weeks after grafting for induction immunosuppression followed by the triple drug regimen for maintenance immunosuppression (Robertson and Sutherland, 1992).
Doses differ and are adjusted individually according to parameters such as white blood count, platelet count, and serum levels of the immunosuppressive agent (Taylor et al., 1994).
Further, anticoagulation therapy, which is not always used and varies when it is used, may involve the administration of aspirin, heparin, dipyridamole, antithrombin III, and/or dextran.
Each of the variables in the overall transplantation procedure can influence patient and graft survival rates and health outcomes.
Rejection-Monitoring and Treatment
Monitoring of rejection episodes may involve a combination of different tests, including biopsies, radiological and nuclear studies, and measurements of enzyme levels and urine output.
Kidney graft function is monitored by measurement of the serum creatinine level, which, when elevated, indicates a rejection episode.
If rejection is confirmed through biopsy, antirejection therapy is warranted (Abecassis and Corry, 1993).
Monitoring of pancreas graft function has been more problematic.
For recipients of SPK transplants, kidney rejection can be used as a marker for pancreas rejection since there is good evidence that rejection usually occurs in both organs simultaneously (Robertson and Sutherland, 1992) though there have been isolated cases of pancreas rejection without kidney rejection (Abecassis and Corry, 1993).
Because an increase in blood sugar following pancreas transplantation would indicate a non-functioning pancreas, blood glucose levels are monitored; however, increased blood sugar is considered a late marker and earlier indications of rejection are necessary for graft salvage (Robertson and Sutherland, 1992).
Measurement of pancreatic exocrine secretions in the urine are valuable markers of graft function, but these are only possible in pancreas recipients who have undergone the bladder drainage method, which is the primary reason this method is the most commonly used.
A decrease in the level of one of these enzymes, urinary amylase, is indicative of pancreas rejection, which may be confirmed by percutaneous or transcystoscopic core biopsy.
Several experts are reluctant to perform these biopsies due to potential hazards, but others feel they are necessary to improve success rates for PTA or PAK until improved modalities for detecting pancreas rejection are confirmed.
Preliminary studies on levels of serum anodal trypsinogen and plasma pancreatic secretory trypsin inhibitor suggest that these biochemical markers may be valuable in detecting pancreas graft rejection (Abecassis and Corry, 1993).
When a rejection episode is suspected or confirmed, treatment usually consists of a temporary increase in steroids and/or administration of an anti-T-cell agent, such as OKT3, ALG, or ATG (Robertson and Sutherland, 1992; Taylor et al., 1994).
Complications
The benefits of pancreas transplantation must be weighed against the potential risks of the surgical procedure and chronic immunosuppression.
These risks fall into a few general categories, including pancreatitis, dehydration, and infectious, urologic, and vascular complications.
Pancreatitis, an inflammation of the pancreas due to autodigestion of pancreatic tissue by its own enzymes, can be related to the development of pseudocysts, rejection, or infection (Taylor et al., 1994).
It is felt by some experts that pancreatitis is directly associated with handling, trauma, and injury related to organ procurement.
Most patients experience some degree of pancreatitis, which can usually be resolved with non-surgical procedures; however, some proceed to a more severe form of pancreatitis that can lead to multiorgan dysfunction and sepsis or to pancreas graft loss in 20% to 100% of the patients (Grewal et al., 1993).
In addition to pancreatitis, fluid management often poses a problem for diabetic pancreas recipients due to pre-existing hypotension related to diabetes.
Severe dehydration and metabolic acidosis can result from the loss of sodium and bicarbonate from pancreatic exocrine secretions.
Multiple hospital readmissions may be required for certain patients who experience problems with losing fluid through the urinary tract and maintaining an adequate oral intake (Taylor et al., 1994).
As with all solid organ transplants, there is a tendency for opportunistic fungal, viral, and bacterial infections to develop, though these are usually managed easily and do not often contribute to patient or graft loss.
However, with pancreas transplantation, there is an increased incidence of urinary tract infections associated with the bladder drainage technique and an increased risk of developing abscesses in the area of the pancreas or within the abdomen.
Many of the urinary tract infections observed after pancreas transplantation have been caused by organisms not usually associated with urinary tract infections.
It is believed that the combination of bladder drainage and immunosuppression has predisposed the bladder to these infections, making them difficult to eradicate.
Moreover, the combination of tissue breakdown from pancreatitis and exposure to bacterial contamination can lead to the formation of abscesses within the abdomen or around the pancreas.
In addition to urinary tract infections, the bladder-drainage technique is associated with an increased incidence of other urologic complications, including hematuria, perforation of the duodenal segment, urethritis, and urethral stricture (Taylor et al., 1994).
Another serious infectious complication is the development of cytomegalovirus (CMV) in 50% to 70% of pancreas/kidney recipients.
While symptoms in most patients may include leukopenia, low-grade fever, and lethargy, in 10% to 30% of these patients, significant CMV disease may develop, leading to intravascular coagulation, major organ damage, and death (Bartucci et al., 1992).
The overall incidence of other infectious complications among over 2000 pancreas recipients in the USA was 2% for 2,112 SPK recipients, 3.90% for 205 PAK recipients, and 2% for 147 PTA recipients (Sutherland et al., 1993b).
Vascular complications, including thrombosis, hemorrhage, and embolism, may also develop involving arteries or veins (Taylor et al., 1994).
The overall rates of thrombosis and bleeding episodes among the over 2,000 patients included in the International Pancreas Transplant Registry report were, respectively, 6.30% and 0.76% for SPK recipients, 12.7% and 0.98% for PAK recipients, and 10.9% and 0.75% for PTA recipients (Sutherland et al., 1993b).
In addition, pancreas graft thrombosis reportedly occurs in 10% to 30% of the cases and is attributed to surgical technique in procurement and placement, acute rejection, and the vasoconstricting effects of the immunosuppressive agent cyclosporin.
When graft thrombosis occurs, graft removal is the only option (Grewal et al., 1993).
Though rare, recurrence of diabetes has been reported and has been linked to two different circumstances.
In a few cases involving segmental donor grafts from nondiabetic siblings to nonimmunosuppressed identical twins, autoimmune isletitus, the original cause of Type I diabetes, developed resulting in beta-cell destruction and disease recurrence (Sutherland et al., 1993b).
Type II diabetes has also developed in some patients in response to hyperglycemia resulting from increased glucose production by the liver in response to steroids.
In these cases, the functioning pancreas graft secretes additional insulin while peripheral cells remain resistant and require more insulin (Bartucci et al., 1992).
Immunosuppressive or adjuvant therapy may cause additional complications and increase the risk of infections and malignant disease (Remuzzi et al., 1994).
The most frequent side effect with azathioprine is severe leukopenia, observed in over 50% of the patients given this drug and usually occurring late in the course of administration but reversing upon dose reduction or withdrawal.
Cyclosporin is associated with a 25% incidence of nephrotoxicity or renal dysfunction (PDR, 1995), and OKT3 is associated with a nine-fold increase in lymphoproliferative disorders.
Cyclosporin and steroids also increase blood pressure and alter the lipid profile, which may offset the cardiovascular benefits of achieving normal blood glucose levels.
High-dose steroids have been linked to a high incidence of peripheral vascular disease among pancreas graft recipients, which has resulted in amputation in 20% of these patients.
Steroids have also been responsible for gastrointestinal bleeding and perforation (Remuzzi et al., 1994) and a number of other adverse effects, including fluid and electrolyte disturbances, loss or muscle or bone mass or muscle weakness, dermatologic disturbances, menstrual irregularities, growth suppression, insulin disorders, convulsions, vertigo, headache, cataracts, and glaucoma (PDR, 1995).
Hospital Stay
When compared with kidney transplantation alone (KTA), which is performed routinely for the treatment of diabetic nephropathy, pancreas transplantation is associated with a prolonged postoperative hospital stay and an increased incidence of readmissions for complications.
According to a study conducted by the United States Renal Data System (1992) and involving over 3,168 solitary kidney and simultaneous pancreas/kidney procedures in Type I diabetics with end-stage renal disease, the average post-operative hospitalization was 15 days for KTA and 23 days for SPK while the average number of readmission days per year was 20.13 days for KTA recipients and 31.47 days for pancreas recipients.
Prevalence/Patterns of Technique Use
In 1989, it was estimated that the number of diagnosed diabetics in Minnesota ranged from 90,000 to 107,000 and that about 10% of these (9,000 to 10,700) were insulin-dependent Type 1 diabetics.
At that time, the incidence and prevalence of diabetes related end-stage renal disease in Minnesota were approximately 230 and 800, respectively.
These figures have increased over the previous ten years and are expected to continue to increase (Roesler, Minnesota Diabetes Surveillance Project, 1989).
Information provided by Minnesota data available in January, 1996 indicates that, from 1987 to 1995, a total of 562 pancreas transplantation procedures had been performed in Minnesota, including 331 SPK procedures, 108 PTA procedures, 122 PAK procedures, and 1 simultaneous pancreas/liver (SPL) procedure.
It is unclear if the SPL procedure was performed in a diabetic.
Not including the SPL procedure, TABLE 1 shows the frequency and distribution of each type of pancreas transplantation procedure for each year for both the University of Minnesota transplantation center, which performed 87.55% of the procedures and the Mayo Clinic, which performed 12.45%, as well as the overall totals.
Based upon these figures, the yearly average from 1987 to 1995 is 62.4 procedures, although the number of procedures varied each year.
It appears that the frequency of pancreas transplantation has been steadily increasing, with the exception of 1995, for which the figures may as yet be incomplete.
While these procedures primarily used cadaver organs, living related donor (LRD) organs were used in 3 (.9%) of the SPK procedures, 10 (8.1%) of the PAK procedures, and 9 (8.3%) of the PTA procedures.
All procedures involving LRD organs were performed at the University of Minnesota center.
Among the total number of pancreas transplantations performed in Minnesota, only 128 procedures involved residents of the state.
Among Minnesota residents, pancreas transplantations included 95 SPK procedures, 23 PAK procedures, and 10 PTA procedures.
The University of Minnesota and the Mayo Clinic performed 75 and 20 SPK procedures, respectively; 22 and 1 PAK procedures, respectively; and 9 and 1 PTA procedures, respectively.
TABLE 1
PANCREAS TRANSPLANTION PROCEDURES IN MINNESOTA YEAR
Location SPK PAK PTA TOTAL
(SPK,PAK,PTA) 1987
University of Minnesota
Mayo Clinic 1
2 1
0 3
0 5
2 1988
University of Minnesota
Mayo Clinic 26
11 14
3 18
0 58
14 1989
University of Minnesota
Mayo Clinic 30
7 14
1 18
0 62
8 1990
University of Minnesota
Mayo Clinic 29
6 18
0 14
0 62*
6 1991
University of Minnesota
Mayo Clinic 21
6 7
0 13
0 41
6 1992
University of Minnesota
Mayo Clinic 35
10 12
0 10
1 57
11 1993
University of Minnesota
Mayo Clinic 40
8 24
1 13
0 77
9 1994
University of Minnesota 51
7 13
0 12
0 76
7 1995
University of Minnesota
Mayo Clinic 34
7 14
0 6
0 54**
7 TOTAL
University of Minnesota
Mayo Clinic
Overall
267
64
331
117
5
122
107
1
108
492**
70
562
* This figure includes one pancreas/liver transplantation procedure not shown in the table.
** One additional pancreas transplantation procedure was performed at the University of Minnesota, changing the total of procedures for 1995 in that institution to 55, the total of procedures in that institution to 493, and the total of procedures in Minnesota to 563.
However, the type of procedure was not designated, therefore is not included in the table.
FDA-APPROVAL
Immunosuppressive Agents
The immunosuppressive agents approved by the FDA for use with organ transplantation are cyclosporin, azathioprine, polyclonal antithymocyte globulin (equine), muromonab-CD3 (monoclonal antibodies), and tacrolimus (FK506).
Cyclosporin (Sandimmune®, manufactured by Sandoz) is indicated for prophylaxis of organ rejection in kidney, liver, and heart allogeneic transplantations.
Azathioprine (Imuran®, manufactured by Glaxo-Wellcome) and polyclonal antithymocyte globulin (ATGAM®, manufactured by Upjohn) are FDA-approved to prevent rejection in renal allografts only.
Muromonab-CD3 (ORTHOCLONE OKT®3, manufactured by Ortho Biotech) is indicated for treatment of acute allograft rejection in renal transplant patients and for treatment of steroid-resistant acute allograft rejection in heart and liver transplant patients.
FK506 (PROGRAF^TM, manufactured by Fujisawa) has been approved by the FDA for the prophylaxis of organ rejection in patients receiving allogeneic liver transplants (PDR, 1995).
None of these agents has been specifically approved for pancreas transplantation.
Corticosteroids
Prednisone and methylprednisolone are corticosteroids approved for several indications, including: endocrine disorders, rheumatic disorders, collagen diseases, dermatologic diseases, allergic states, ophthalmic diseases, respiratory diseases, hematologic disorders, neoplastic diseases, edematous states, and gastrointestinal disorders.
Both corticosteroids are manufactured under a variety of names by different manufacturers; however, neither is specifically approved for use in organ transplantation (PDR, 1995).
Heparin
Heparin sodium, manufactured by Wyeth-Ayerst Laboratories, Upjohn, and Lilly, is FDA-approved for the following indications: prevention of clotting in arterial and heart surgery, prevention of postoperative deep venous thrombosis and pulmonary embolism in patients undergoing abdomino-thoracic surgery or patients who for other reasons are at risk for developing thromboembolic disease, anticoagulant therapy, and maintenance of patency of indwelling venipuncture devices used for intermittent injection or infusion therapy (PDR, 1995).
PUBLIC AGENCIES AND PROFESSIONAL ASSOCIATIONS
Health Care Financing Administration (HCFA)
In a telephone call on May 4, 1995, a spokesperson from HCFA stated that coverage for pancreas transplantation is not approved because it is considered an experimental procedure.
Agency for Health Care Policy and Research (AHCPR), Division of Office of Health Technology Assessment (OHTA)
The AHCPR has recently completed an assessment report on pancreas transplantation, entitled "Simultaneous Pancreas-Kidney and Sequential Pancreas-after-Kidney Transplantation" (AHCPR, 1995).
After reviewing letter responses from transplant centers and over 100 published articles on pancreas transplantation, the AHCPR reported that, although surgical techniques have improved and both simultaneous and sequential combined pancreas/kidney transplantation are associated with relatively low mortality rates, these procedures are also associated with a significantly higher rate of morbidity, resulting in a greater frequency of readmissions and more prolonged hospitalization, than kidney transplantation alone (KTA).
In addition, while most complications occur within the first year after transplantation, "it has not yet been determined whether the more intensive immunosuppression required in combined transplants vs. [sic] that required in KTA will be associated with additional deleterious long-term effects" (page 46).
Moreover, the published data did not provide clear support of claims that SPK or PAK prevented or ameliorated the secondary diabetic complications of nephropathy, retinopathy, and neuropathy; thus, "It cannot be concluded with reasonable certainty that prevention, improvement, amelioration, or mitigation of secondary complications are likely to result from SPK or PAK or provide a valid rationale for the procedures" (page 46).
Further, evaluations of post-transplant quality of life, often proclaimed as a valid objective for pancreas transplantation, suffer from methodologic flaws.
Although the available evidence suggests that quality of life is improved after combined pancreas/kidney transplantation, the use of subjective impressions, the lack of prospective studies, and the lack of consistent evidence from objective quality-of-life measures do not allow a clear position on quality of life.
Noting that the majority of SPK transplantations use single donor cadaver organs, the AHCPR stated that this procedure cannot provide the improved renal graft protection associated with a living related donor (LRD) kidney transplant; therefore, a potential recipient who chooses SPK over LRD/KTA must accept a 40% to 70% reduction in expected kidney half life in return for a 65% probability of being insulin-independent at three years post-transplant.
Although PAK allows the possibility of a LRD kidney graft and the consequent improvement in kidney graft survival, the patient must undergo two surgical procedures and accept the probability of lower long-term pancreas graft survival associated with PAK (about 35% at three years) as compared with SPK.
Moreover, the agency stated that, due to the lack of valid and reliable evidence regarding the benefits of SPK and PAK and the lack of accessible data regarding the costs of these procedures, it was not possible to confidently compare differences in the clinical efficacy of SPK, PAK, and KTA or to determine the cost-effectiveness of combined pancreas/kidney transplantations.
Although a cost-effectiveness model, based upon limited cost data and assumptions regarding quality of life, was constructed and demonstrated that SPK was likely to be as cost effective as KTA when considering the annual cost of treating insulin-dependence in KTA recipients, this model did not allow for definitive conclusions regarding cost-effectiveness; it emphasized instead concerns regarding the appropriateness of combined transplant in patients with relatively mild or uncomplicated diabetes.
In fact, the lack of detailed descriptions of patient selection criteria was noted by the AHCPR as the most disturbing characteristic in the published literature.
Although frequent references to contraindications were made in the literature, it was not clear if the severity of diabetes, the intensity of the required insulin regimen, and the complications associated with blood glucose control played a significant role in patient selection; several transplant centers informed OHTA that these factors were not considered important criteria in choosing recipients.
In addition, the AHCPR expressed doubt regarding the clinical utility of some of the pretransplant tests, such as ultrasound gallbladder studies, prophylactic cholecystectomy in asymptomatic patients, mammography, PSA screening, etc., stating that "these studies might be viewed as variations in the clinical judgement in the face of uncertainty" (page 47).
The AHCPR concluded that in order to form any logical and scientific conclusions regarding combined pancreas/kidney transplantation, additional objective data from well-designed large-scale, long-term prospective studies are needed, especially regarding the benefits and efficacy of the procedures, patient selection criteria, quality of life, and costs.
The agency also emphasized that retransplantation is a significant issue that requires careful evaluation.
While the national frequency of retransplantation is low, the retransplant rate in those centers performing the highest numbers of SPK and PAK procedures is not insignificant.
Because graft survival is lower in retransplantion as compared with primary transplantation procedures, this practice raises a number of issues regarding the medical benefit, cost-effectiveness, and the ethical appropriateness of the use of scarce donor organs.
National Institutes of Health (NIH)
A telephone call on April 18, 1995 revealed that this agency has not conducted an assessment on pancreas transplantation for diabetes.
United Network for Organ Sharing (UNOS)
The United Network for Organ Sharing (UNOS) is a registry for all organ transplantations performed in the United States.
This organization administers the National Organ Procurement and Transplant Network.
Through a subcontract with the International Pancreas Transplant Registry (IPTR), data from worldwide cases of pancreas transplantation are reported to UNOS.
While both organizations record and provide statistical data on the number of procedures performed, patient demographics, procedural details (recipient category, duct management techniques), donor-organ details, and outcomes with respect to patient and graft survival rates, neither forms conclusions regarding the procedures.
However, a number of analyses have been performed on the statistical data provided by these organizations.
Because these analyses consist of the largest patient populations among published articles on pancreas transplantation, details of the compiled data have been incorporated throughout this report, particularly in the REVIEW OF EVIDENCE section, and emphasized as either UNOS or IPTR statistics.
American Diabetes Association (ADA)
In a position statement entitled "Pancreas Transplantation for Patients with Diabetes Mellitus" (1992a), the American Diabetes Association presents its guidelines based upon its technical review (1992b), which has the same title and provides further details.
The agency states that, while pancreas transplantation has been performed in thousands of diabetic patients and has become accepted therapy in certain cases, it is surrounded by issues regarding its indications and respective risks and benefits.
Successful transplantation can significantly improve the quality of life of diabetics by eliminating the need for exogenous insulin, blood glucose measurements, dietary restrictions, and complications associated with exogenous insulin therapy, but there is insufficient evidence at this time regarding its effects on the long-term complications of diabetes.
Because critical questions such as whether or not pancreas grafting has any positive effect on the development or progression of vascular disease have not yet been clarified, it is too early to determine the ultimate impact of transplantation on life expectancy (1992b).
Therefore, prevention or attenuation of chronic diabetic complications and increased life expectancy are not indications for pancreas transplantation (1992a).
The ADA recognizes that pancreas graft survival rates for combined pancreas/kidney transplantation have been higher than those of solitary pancreas transplantation and appear to be due to the more efficient methods for detecting episodes of kidney rejection and the resultant changes in immunosuppression that protect the pancreas graft as well.
Based upon survival data, the ADA recommends that combined pancreas/kidney transplantation, either SPK or PAK, be considered an acceptable alternative to insulin therapy for diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease who meet the criteria for kidney transplantation, have significant problems with insulin therapy, and do not have excessive risk for the surgical procedure, and that Medicare and other insurers should include coverage for pancreas procedures meeting these criteria.
Moreover, the agency recommends that solitary pancreas transplantation should be considered only for a select few patients who have a history of severe, metabolic complications necessitating medical attention, who have severe incapacitating clinical and emotional problems with exogenous insulin therapy, and for whom other therapeutic approaches to alleviate the situation have failed.
If these criteria are met, as well as institutional guidelines for assuring an objective multidisciplinary patient evaluation and determination of eligibility for transplantation, coverage by insurers is appropriate (1992a).
Further, it is recommended that centers that perform pancreas transplantations be tertiary care centers with an active kidney transplant program and the ability to adequately handle the medical and psychosocial needs of the patients.
The ADA also adds that, although islet cell transplantation holds potential advantages over whole-gland transplantation, it is considered experimental at this time (1992a).
American Medical Association (AMA)
A telephone call on April 18, 1995 revealed that the Diagnostic and Therapeutic Technology Assessment (DATTA) of pancreatic transplantation completed by the AMA in 1990 has not been revised or updated.
According to this report, no consensus was reached by the 26 DATTA panelists on the safety and effectiveness of pancreas transplantation alone or of pancreas transplantation in combination with a kidney transplant.
In categorizing both the safety and efficacy of combined pancreas/kidney transplantation, the panelists' conclusions were divided primarily between "promising" and "investigational" ratings.
However, two panelists rated the safety of the combined procedure as doubtful, one rated the efficacy as doubtful, and two rated the efficacy as established.
In categorizing the safety and efficacy of solitary pancreas transplantation, about half of the panelists (50% and 46%, respectively), regarded this procedure as investigational; six rated the procedure as doubtful, and two felt the procedure was unacceptable.
The safety and efficacy of solitary pancreas transplantation was rated as promising by five and six panelists, respectively.
The panelists felt that, while improvements in surgical technique, graft preservation, and immunosuppression have resulted in improved patient and graft survival rates, and pancreas grafts have been beneficial in terms of neuropathy, nephropathy, and quality of life, the toxicity of immunosuppression and the monitoring of pancreas rejection in solitary pancreas transplants remain problematic (Brown, 1990).
REVIEW OF EVIDENCE: PATIENT SELECTION CRITERIA
Quality of Available Evidence
Much of the evidence included throughout the report is provided by analyses of data from the United Network of Organ Sharing (UNOS) and the International Pancreas Transplant Registry (IPTR).
While providing statistical data regarding outcomes of pancreas transplantation (alone or combined) for a large patient population and determining the recipient categories, duct management techniques, immunosuppressive regimens, patient characteristics, etc., which result in the best outcomes, these analyses do not provide conclusions regarding the safety, efficacy, or appropriateness of pancreas transplantation per se.
A number of additional studies have provided such conclusions, but these are limited by small patient samples, incomplete reporting of results, or insufficient data on patient selection criteria.
General Guidelines
Potential organ recipients must undergo a pretransplant evaluation and must qualify for transplantation, satisfying not only strict medical criteria but also psychological criteria that indicate the ability to comply with an elaborate regimen of postoperative care.
Organ transplantation is generally only considered in cases of end-stage disease when no other medical or surgical therapy would be beneficial and prognosis for one-year survival is poor (Schwartz et al., 1989).
However, pancreas transplantation differs from other organ transplantations because it is not performed to save or prolong life; thus, it is more difficult to determine indications for its use, and patient selection is often determined by balancing the potential benefits of transplantation with the risks of surgery and prolonged immunosuppression.
Criteria for pancreas transplantation differ from center to center.
In its assessment report on pancreas transplantation (Brown, 1990), the American Medical Association suggests the following general guidelines for any pancreas transplantation:
* Age of 15 years to 50 years * ABO blood group compatibility * absence of systemic complications (gangrene, gastroenteropathy, coronary artery disease)
Additional general guidelines used at most centers performing pancreas transplantation also include (Taylor et al., 1994):
* Type I diabetes * Predicted ability to tolerate the surgical procedure as well as post-transplant immunosuppression and potential complications * Emotional and psychiatric stability including a strong family support network * Ability to understand investigative nature and risks of the procedure * Presence of overt secondary diabetic complications, especially nephropathy but including retinopathy, and neuropathy
Simultaneous Pancreas/Kidney (SPK) and Pancreas After Kidney (PAK) Transplantation
In an assessment report prepared by the Institute for Clinical Systems Integration (1994), it was stated that major transplant centers, including the University of Wisconsin, University of California/San Francisco, Massachusetts General Hospital, Pacific Presbyterian Medical Center/San Francisco, Ohio State University, and Kaiser-Permanente, all accept the following general patient selection criteria for SPK:
* Age between 18 years to 50 years * Type I diabetes * End-stage renal disease not necessarily requiring dialysis * Mild diabetic complications with no prior multiple abdominal surgeries
Not all transplant centers, however, use the same criteria.
With respect to diabetic complications, The University of Michigan center specifies only established diabetic nephropathy or autonomic neuropathy as indications for pancreas transplantation (Brown, 1990), and the University of Iowa does not require renal disease to have progressed to end-stage as long as uremia is present (Abecassis and Corry, 1993).
The criteria that apply to SPK also apply to PAK, except that potential recipients have already ameliorated renal disease with a previous kidney transplantation (Institute for Clinical Systems Integrated, 1994).
Patients who have undergone kidney transplantation are already committed to life-long immunosuppression; therefore, the addition of pancreas transplantation adds only the surgical risk of the procedure since immunosuppression does not usually need to be altered (Abecassis and Corry, 1993).
The American Diabetes Association (1992a) states that SPK or PAK is appropriate for diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease who meet the criteria for kidney transplantation, have significant problems with insulin therapy, and do not have excessive risk for the surgical procedure.
Though indications vary from center to center, the guidelines followed by the leading transplant centers have been modified by clinical experience.
While not all diabetics with kidney failure are appropriate candidates for SPK, those between the ages of 20 to 40 years who have minimal secondary complications of diabetes are considered optimal candidates at the University of Nebraska center.
The degree of renal dysfunction and the degree of cardiovascular risk are also primary determinants of patient selection (Stratta et al., 1993).
The timing of SPK relative to the degree of nephropathy is one of the controversial issues of patient selection.
At the University of Nebraska, patients with creatinine clearance of 45 mL/min are considered eligible for SPK because it is felt that the procedure can be performed safely and effectively in the absence of uremia, which not only facilitates rehabilitation but also provides the possibility of arresting the progression of diabetic complications prior to the development of end-stage renal disease.
Patients with a creatinine clearance of over 70 mL/min would be considered for PTA, rather than SPK (Stratta et al., 1993).
Not all experts agree with these specifics.
Taylor et al. (1994) assert that SPK is indicated by a creatinine clearance of 
Pancreas Transplantation Alone (PTA)
The selection criteria for PTA are less clear but are generally based upon exogenous insulin failure or the presence of early diabetic complications.
The American Medical Association (Brown,1990) states that PTA is indicated in cases of preuremia with lesions that predict progression to end-stage renal disease.
In addition, the diabetic complications that are predicted if no transplant is performed must outweigh the potential side effects from immunosuppression.
At the University of Minnesota transplant center, potential PTA recipients must have nonrenal complications of diabetes not only refractory to exogenous insulin but also judged to become more severe than the side effects of immunosuppression and correctable by pancreas transplantation (Robertson and Sutherland, 1992).
Ideally, PTA should be performed prior to the development of secondary diabetic complications; however, before the earliest signs of these complications are present, there are no reliable markers that predict which patients will development them, although they can be detected early (Stratta et al., 1993; Abecassis and Corry, 1993).
Because there are no accurate methods to predict the development of secondary complications, the Institute of Clinical Systems Integration (1994) does not recommend PTA at all.
At the University of Nebraska, insulin independence in itself is not considered justification for the requirement of chronic immunosuppression associated with PTA unless a positive effect on diabetic complications is possible; therefore, potential PTA recipients must demonstrate a propensity toward these complications, which are predicted to be worse than the undesirable side effects of immunosuppression (Stratta et al., 1993).
It is unclear whether this propensity must be proven, but the University of Iowa center does require documented evidence of early secondary complications, such as the presence of albuminuria or reduced creatinine clearance or biopsy proof of nephropathy (Abecassis and Corry, 1993).
The University of Minnesota center, which performs more PTA procedures than other centers, uses PTA primarily to treat patients with extremely labile diabetes, defined as oscillation "between the extremes of hyper- and hypoglycemia, no matter what insulin regimen is used, even when under the supervision of a diabetologist or other physician experienced in diabetic management."
(page 1602).
Most potential recipients at this institution also experience hypoglycemic unawareness but, in general, have less advanced secondary complications than SPK recipients (Gruessner et al., 1994).
In addition, these patients were unable to live independently, requiring constant presence of a friend or relative, due to significant problems with insulin control (Sutherland et al., 1994).
The University of Michigan center defines labile diabetes more specifically (Brown, 1990):
* Diabetes refractory to treatment with exogenous insulin with hospitalization for 90 or more days in the past year for glucose control problems * Occurrence of six or more hypoglycemic episodes in one month requiring emergency medical attention * Occurrence of four or more episodes of unexplained ketoacidosis during the past year
It has been argued that most patients with this degree of lability are either noncompliant or have significant family or individual psychopathology, and that transplantation may be inappropriate for patients such as this (Goldon and Orr, 1989).
But proponents of pancreas transplantation for labile diabetes, while agreeing with the necessity for compliance, contend that successful transplantation is associated with patient satisfaction with glucose control, insulin-independence, and improved sense of well-being, which contribute to an improved attitude and compliance (Vinek and Dafoe, 1989).
The American Diabetes Association (1992a) recommends that solitary pancreas transplantation be considered only for a select few patients who have a history of severe, metabolic complications necessitating medical attention, who have severe incapacitating clinical and emotional problems with exogenous insulin therapy, and for whom other therapeutic approaches to alleviate the situation have failed.
Contraindications
Most transplant centers consider the following circumstances contraindications to pancreas transplantation (Taylor et al., 1994):
* Significant coronary artery disease * Obesity * Presence of active infection or malignancy * Active substance abuse or dependence * History of noncompliance
Further exclusion criteria are applied at some centers.
The University of Michigan considers psychiatric illness, peptic ulcer, and advanced nephropathy with creatinine clearance of 
While some centers feel that blindness or peripheral vascular disease are relevant exclusion criteria, others do not agree.
Following an analysis of 319 pancreas transplantation procedures (all types) performed at the University of Minnesota center to determine recipient risk factors, Gruessner et al. (1994) concluded that blindness, peripheral vascular disease, and duration of diabetes did not negatively affect patient and graft outcomes in any recipient category; however, age 45 years and cardiac disease were risk factors for SPK and PAK recipients.
Although PAK is considered in diabetic patients with a well-functioning kidney since these patients are already committed to immunosuppression, poor results with PAK at the University of Nebraska have been attributed to previous history of significant soft tissue infection, which has often resulted in reinfection following transplantation and, subsequently, pancreatitis caused by the same organism responsible for soft tissue infection.
Thus, at this institution, a history of soft tissue infection is considered a contraindication to PAK, as well as a relative contraindication to PTA (Stratta et al., 1993).
CONCLUSIONS: PATIENT SELECTION CRITERIA
While it must be noted that patient selection criteria for pancreas transplantation are not standardized or static and specific definitions and limitations apply at different centers, the guidelines provided in TABLE 2 appear to be generally accepted at most transplant centers.
Specific indications for SPK or PAK include the presence of renal disease and mild secondary diabetic complications, and the lack of prior multiple abdominal surgeries.
Indications for PTA include preuremia or nonuremia with a propensity toward diabetic complications, which are predicted to be worse than the undesirable side effects of immunosuppression, or extremely labile diabetes, refractory to any type of exogenous insulin regimen or other therapeutic approach, with severe metabolic complications and incapacitating clinical or emotional problems.
TABLE 2
INDICATIONS FOR PANCREAS TRANSPLANTATION
A. General guidelines for any pancreas transplantation: + Age of 18 years to 50 years + ABO blood group compatibility + Lack of systemic complications + Type I diabetes + Predicted ability to tolerate the surgical procedure as well as post-transplant immunosuppression and potential complications + Emotional and psychiatric stability including a strong family support network + Ability to understand investigative nature and risks of the procedure + The presence of overt secondary diabetic complications, especially nephropathy but including retinopathy, and neuropathy B. Indications for SPK and PAK: + Renal disease (no consensus on degree of renal dysfunction) + Mild secondary diabetic complications + No prior multiple abdominal surgeries C. Indications for PTA: + Preuremia or nonuremia with propensity toward diabetic complications which are predicted to be worse than the undesirable side effects of immunosuppression or + Extremely labile diabetes, refractory to any type of exogenous insulin regimen or other therapeutic approach, with severe metabolic complications and incapacitating clinical or emotional problems D. Contraindications: + Absolute contraindications o Significant coronary artery disease o Presence of active infection or malignancy o Active substance abuse or dependence o History of noncompliance o Psychiatric illness o Peptic ulcer o Advanced nephropathy with creatinine clearance of 
REVIEW OF EVIDENCE: TREATMENT OUTCOMES
Patient and Graft Survival
Sutherland et al. (1993b) presented an analysis of patient and graft survival rates for all pancreas transplantations reported to the United Network of Organ Sharing (UNOS) from October 1987 to November 1993, including those reported through a subcontract with the International Pancreas Transplant Registry (IPTR).
The analysis excluded all cases with insufficient data or no follow-up, all cases involving simultaneous transplantation with the heart or liver in nondiabetic patients, and, due to the small number involved, all transplants involving a living related donor or involving duct drainage methods other than the bladder drainage method for the USA cases.
According to the definitions used in this analysis, pancreas graft survival refers only to pancreas grafts that are functioning to the point of insulin-independence for patients, and partial graft function or patient death with a functioning graft is considered a graft failure.
Results of the analysis revealed that, among the 2,464 remaining cadaveric pancreas transplants involving the bladder drainage technique (96%) in Type I diabetics in the USA, the overall one-, two-, and three-year survival rates were 91%, 87%, and 84%, respectively, for patients and 72%, 67%, and 62%, respectively, for grafts.
For the 93 retransplant cases, one-year graft survival was significantly lower than that for the 2,371 primary transplant cases (42% versus 73%, respectively).
Data for the 3,569 worldwide cases are presented in TABLE 3.
For solitary pancreas transplantation, the graft survival rates were significantly higher in the USA than in Europe (48% versus 26%, respectively).
The lower pancreas-graft survival rate in Europe is attributed to the methods used for exocrine duct management.
While 96% of the pancreas transplants performed in the USA used the bladder drainage technique, only 62% of the European cases used bladder drainage with the remaining cases managed with duct injection (28%), enteric drainage (9%), or other methods (7 patients).
TABLE 3
OVERALL ONE-YEAR PATIENT AND GRAFT SURVIVAL RATES (Reported to IPTR* October 1987 to November 1993) Survival Category USA Europe Other Overall (p Values) A. Patient
(3569 patients) 91% (2,573 patients) 92% (921 patients) 86% (75 patients) 91% (
* IPTR: International Pancreas Transplant Registry (reported by Sutherland et al., 1993b)
Further analyses were performed on the USA data.
Analysis of the bladder drainage cases according to recipient category (SPK, PAK, PTA) demonstrated that, while one-year patient survival rates did not differ (91%, 92%, and 91%, respectively), one-year pancreas graft survival was significantly higher in the SPK category at 76% than in the PAK or PTA categories at 47% and 48%, respectively.
One-year kidney graft survival was 85% in the SPK group.
Although sex was not found to influence outcome, age made a significant difference.
One-year rates for patient survival and insulin-independence were 92% and 72%, respectively, for recipients under 45 years of age and 85% and 69%, respectively, for those above 45 years.
These differences, however, were observed only in the SPK and PAK categories.
With respect to race, outcomes were slightly better for African Americans than for whites with one-year patient survival rates of 95% versus 91%, respectively, and one-year graft survival rates of 84% versus 75%, respectively, although only 6% of the pancreas transplantation procedures were performed on African Americans.
Graft-preservation time was also analyzed.
While no differences in graft survival were found in the SPK category for storage times of less than 12 hours to 30 hours or more, outcomes in the PAK and PTA category were variable and no consistent pattern could be determined (Sutherland et al., 1993b).
The effects of different immunosuppressive regimens and mismatching of different HLA antigens were also compared.
Although maintenance immunosuppression was found to be similar for most transplants, induction immunosuppression consisted of either ALG/ATG, OKT3, or neither of these.
In the SPK category, one-year graft survival rates did not differ according to the immunosuppressive protocol; however, these rates were 58%, 26%, and 53%, respectively, for PAK recipients and 53%, 49%, and none [sic (page 68)], respectively, for PTA recipients.
With respect to HLA-mismatching, one-year graft survival was actually better with 2 to 6 mismatched HLA antigens (76%) than with 0 to 1 mismatched HLA antigen in the SPK category.
However, graft survival was significantly higher in the PAK category with 0 to 1 mismatched HLA antigen (66%) than for 2 to 6 mismatches (44%) and higher, though not significantly, in the PTA category for 0 to 1 mismatch (56%) than for 2 to 6 mismatches (48%) (Sutherland et al., 1993b).
Grafts were considered unsuccessful if they were nonfunctioning or partially functioning or if patient death occurred even with a functioning graft.
The total number of cases classified as graft failures was 770.
Among 542 grafts listed as nonfunctioning, graft failure was due to technical reasons, including thrombosis, bleeding, infection, anastomotic leak, and pancreatitis, or acute or chronic rejection.
Analysis of the UNOS data of bladder-drained cadaver pancreas transplants revealed an overall technical failure rate of 12.5%
The authors concluded that, while, overall, recipient category was the most significant factor influencing the outcomes of pancreas transplantation with higher graft survival rates for SPK than for PAK or PTA, other variables also affected results with respect to recipient category.
Minimizing HLA mismatches was associated with higher graft survival in the PAK and PTA categories, and lower graft survival was observed in the PAK category for retransplantation procedures as compared with primary transplants.
Moreover, the risk of graft loss was significantly lowered in the PTA category with the use of anti-T-cell induction immunosuppression (Sutherland et al., 1993b).
After analyzing data on 435 diabetic patients receiving either a cadaver or living related donor kidney transplant (KTA), a living related donor kidney transplant followed by a cadaver pancreas transplant (PAK), or cadaver SPK at the University of Minnesota transplant center, Cheung and colleagues (1993) determined that kidney transplant from a living related donor followed by pancreas transplant from a cadaver donor was associated with significantly higher long-term kidney graft survival and equivalent pancreas graft survival as compared with cadaver KTA, living related donor KTA, or cadaver SPK (94%, 69%, 89%, and 63%, respectively, at three years).
Therefore, the best option for those eligible for combined pancreas/kidney transplantation is to first receive a living related donor kidney followed by pancreas transplantation of either a whole or segmental cadaver organ or a segmental living related donor organ (PAK).
When organ donation from a living relative is not possible, SPK is recommended at the University of Minnesota (Goetz et al., 1991).
Metabolic or Hormonal Control
Graft survival rates reported by Sutherland et al. (1993b) in the analysis of the International Pancreas Transplant Registry (IPTR) refer only to grafts functioning to the point of insulin-independence for patients.
Among a total of 3,569 worldwide cases, insulin independence was achieved by 71% of 573 USA patients, 68% of 921 European patients, and 78% of 75 patients transplanted elsewhere.
(See TABLE 3).
For retransplant cases, one-year graft survival was significantly lower than that for primary transplant cases (42% versus 73%, respectively).
Although improved surgical techniques and immunosuppressive protocols have resulted in improved graft survival since the inception of the United Network of Organ Sharing (UNOS), graft survival was found to be influenced by a number of factors, in particular, recipient category (SPK, PAK, PTA).
Among over 2,000 transplants performed in the USA, 96% of which were SPK, one-year pancreas graft survival was significantly higher in the SPK category at 76% than in the PAK or PTA categories at 47% and 48%, respectively.
For PTA, the graft survival rates were significantly higher in the USA than in Europe (48% versus 26%, respectively), which has been attributed to the higher usage in the USA of the bladder drainage method of exocrine duct management.
One-year graft survival rates in the USA were 76% for the bladder drainage method and 57% for the enteric drainage method.
While the number of procedures involving the duct injection method was too few to include in the analysis for non-European locations, the one-year graft survival rate for this method in Europe was 61%.
(For further details on recipient category and duct management techniques, see REVIEW OF EVIDENCE: ALTERNATIVE TECHNOLOGIES.)
While gender was not found to influence graft survival and no conclusions were drawn regarding the effects of different organ storage times, graft survival was found to be influenced by age, race, immunosuppression, and HLA-mismatching with respect to recipient category.
Additional studies, while on a much smaller scale, provide more detailed data on metabolic control, complications of pancreas transplantation, and reasons for graft loss.
Results from these studies are provided in TABLE 4.
TABLE 4
PANCREAS ALONE OR PANCREAS/KIDNEY TRANSPLANTATION OUTCOMES
Study
Patient Characteristics
Procedure
Protocol
Results
Conclusions
Comments
Morel et al. (1992)
86 subjects
Retrospective study to analyze effect of pancreas transplant on metabolic control 31 Type I diabetics
Mean age: 32 yrs.
Mean duration of diabetes: 20 yrs.
55 healthy controls 3 SPK, 12 PAK, 16 PTA
IV glucose tolerance tests (IVGTT), oral glucose tolerance tests (OGTT), plasma glucose determinations before and after meals and in the evening, determination of glycosated fraction of hemoglobin (total A1) IVGTT: similar in study and control groups early in study but significantly higher in study group at 72 mos post-transplant
OGTT: similar in both groups
Plasma glucose: only values immediately after lunch and dinner were significantly higher in study group, though mean glucose level well below what is considered diabetic
Total A1: within normal range throughout study and no difference between groups Though pancreas transplantation does not restore an entirely normal metabolism, it allows a close to normal metabolism that is more nearly normal than that afforded by any other form of diabetic therapy.
The initial quality of metabolic control achieved with pancreas transplantation is sustained over a prolonged period of time.
Small study sample
Nyberg et al. (1991a)
98 subjects
Prospective study to assess effects of pancreas transplantation on glycemic control and serum lipids 27 Type 1 diabetics with uremia awaiting SPK
23 Type 1 diabetics with kidney transplant
23 Nondiabetics with kidney transplant
30 Type 1 diabetics with pancreas/kidney transplants
Similar demographics in all groups; transplanted patients on immunosuppression Determination of serum HDL cholesterol and triglycerides,
IV Glucose tolerance test (IVGTT),
Determination of glomerular filtration rate Better metabolic control in recipients of grafts than in diabetics w/o transplants though higher than upper normal limits (hyperinsulinemia)
Triglycerides increased in uremic patients and in nondiabetic kidney-grafted patients but normal in diabetic kidney-grafted patients w or w/o pancreas graft
Total cholesterol increased in uremic diabetic group
HDL normal for all Hyperinsulinemia is due mostly to insulin delivery to the systemic circulation or denervation of the pancreas and partly to the use of corticosteroids.
Renal insufficiency is known to cause increased lipid and triglyceride levels, and findings of this study concur with this.
It is not known whether hyperinsulinemia following pancreas transplantation is harmful.
Di Carlo et al. (1991)
32 subjects
Retrospective study to report experience Type I diabetes and uremia with vasculopathy, neuropathy, and retinopathy
Mean age: 38.7 yrs.
Mean duration of diabetes: 24.6 yrs.
Mean duration of dialysis: 17.4 mos.
SPK in all patients plus one retransplant (total 33), including 26 segmental grafts with neoprine duct occlusion and 7 duodeno-pancreatic graft with bladder drainage
Immuno: azathioprine, prednisone, and ALG or cyclosporin
Anticoagulation: heparin acenocoumarol until Mar. 1988, Dextran Dipyridamole or antithrombin III Acenocoumarol until Sep. 1989, Calcium Heparin Dipyridamole through end of study Patient survival:
1-yr: 93%, 2-yr: 89%
Kidney graft survival:
1-yr: 93%, 5-yr: 72%
Pancreas graft survival: 1-yr: 68%, 5-yr: 58%
Mortality: 6% (due to myocardial infarction, one due to septic bleeding)
Complications:
Surgical: 51%
Rejection/effects from immunosuppression: 71%
Nonsurgical infection: 43%
Pancreas graft failure: 13 (39%) due to thrombosis (20%), rejection (12%), primary nonfunction (3%), or death with functioning graft (3%)
Kidney graft failure: 6 (18%) due to rejection (12%), thrombosis (3%), or death with functioning graft (3%) Technical failures, which hinder pancreas graft survival, require further improvement.
The authors suggest more aggressive post-operative monitoring and treatment and more intense cardiac work-up for patient selection.
Small patient sample Martin et al. (1991)
182 subjects
Retrospective study to compare different surgical, drainage, and immunosuppressive techniques Type I diabetes and neuropathy in all patients, with retinopathy (178), macroangiopathy (71), and/or myocardiopathy (62)
Mean age:
37.2 yrs. (1976-85)
36.9 yrs. (1985-90)
Mean duration of diabetes:
22.0 yrs. (1976-85)
36.9 yrs. (1985-90)
Patients on dialysis:
46 (1976-85)
111 (1985-90)
Duration on dialysis:
10.
mos. (1976-85)
16.
mos. (1985-90) PA for all patients; segmental grafts with neoprene duct occlusion, duodeno-pancreatic grafts with enteric diversion, or duodeno-pancreatic grafts with bladder drainage
Immuno: variety of regimens using different combinations of azathioprine, prednisone, cyclosporin, ALG, and OKT3 Graft survival: 40.6% (74 out of 182)
Overall 5-yr survival of pancreas transplants (not clear if this is graft or patient survival): 45%
Graft losses due to: Rejection (39%)
Venous or arterial thrombosis (42 cases) Pancreatitis or hemorrhage (3 cases)
Mortality: 13.1% (due mostly to cardiovascular complications)
Surgical complications requiring re-operation: 6 in patients with enteric drainage, 1 in patients with duct occlusion The incidence of rejection was lowered with improved immunosuppressive techniques.
The use of urinary amylases as a marker for pancreas rejection in patients with bladder drainage was disappointing.
The incidence of venous thrombosis, a major cause of graft loss, decreased since the use of University of Wisconsin solution.
Although a higher rate of surgical complications occurred after enteric drainage, graft function is similar no matter which surgical technique is used.
Longer follow-up is necessary to determine the best surgical technique.
Some results not reported clearly Königsrainer et al. (1991b)
54 subjects
Retrospective study to report experience Type I diabetes
Mean age:
36.3 yrs (Group I: delayed duct occlusion)
36.9 yrs (Group II: bladder drainage)
Mean duration of diabetes:
29.5 yrs (Group I)
23.0 yrs (Group II)
Mean time on dialysis:
26.0 mos (Group I)
26.5 mos (Group II)
HLA mismatches:
AB: 2.7 (Group I)
3.1 (Group II)
DR: 1.5 (Group I)
1.5 (Group II) 49 SPK (same donor),
5 PTA, 2 retransplant;
segmental graft with tail and parts of head of the gland, including delayed duct (DD) occlusion in 16 patients and bladder drainage (BD) in 38 patients
Immuno: cyclosporin, azathioprine, steroids 1-yr patient survival: 94% (DD), 90% (BD)
1-yr pancreas graft survival: 72 % (DD), 74% (BD)
1-yr renal graft survival: 93% (DD), 89% (BD)
Insulin independence: 75% of surviving patients
Mortality: 12.5% (2) in DD group due to myocardial infarction or amputation of both legs), 15.7% (6) in BD group due to myocardial infarction, cerebral hemorrhage, cytomegalovirus or bacterial pneumonia)
Graft loss due to chronic rejection (4) or pancreatitis (1) in DD group and rejection (7), venous thrombosis (3), or pancreatitis (1) in BD group
Other complications: severe systemic herpes (1), wound infection or fistulae (7), reoperation for hemorrhage (2) in DD group, and reop. for hemorrhage (2) or leakage at pancreatocystomstomy (2) in BD group severe The best graft site is the intraperitoneal position.
Segmental grafting is preferred as it appears to include a sufficient number of islets, is associated with a lower incidence of urinary tract infection, urethritis, balanitis, bleeding and perforation, and transcytoscopical biopsies are easier to perform as compared with whole organ grafting.
The duct occlusion method is preferred to the bladder drainage method as it prevents further damage during the early postoperative period and allows precise monitoring of the exocrine functions.
exocrine Small patient sample Brekke (1991)
75 subjects
Retrospective study to compare techniques Diabetics (type not specified)
Prior to 1988, patients with history of cerebrovascular insult, coronary heart disease, and gangrene included; since then excluded SPK-same donor (63),
PTA (9), and PAK (5)
Segmental graft with neoprene duct occlusion before 1988, whole organ graft with duodeno-pancreatic cystostomy since 1988
Immuno: triple drug regimen (agents not specified)
Anticoagulation: Dextron 70 then aspirin 1-yr patient survival:
PAK: 100%
SPK: 93% - 4 deaths due to myocardial infarction (2), cytomegalovirus (1), fungal sepsis (1)
PTA: 100 % (1 death 5 yrs post-transplant)
1-yr pancreas graft survival:
PTA: 33% (6 lost function)
PAK: 0% (all due to chronic rejection)
SPK: Not specified
PAK and PTA are less successful than SPK.
While the bladder drainage technique allows for monitoring of urinary amylase excretion to detect pancreas rejection, it is associated with a high rate of graft loss; however, 2-year graft survival rates were improved with whole, as opposed to segmental, grafts using the bladder drainage method.
Due to unsatisfactory results in nonuremic patients, the author suggests pancreas transplantation should be reserved for uremic patients and SKP should be the procedure performed.
Small patient sample
Insufficient data on patient selection criteria
Incomplete reporting of results
Esmatjes et al. (1991)
46 subjects
Retrospective study to assess effects of pancreas transplantation on metabolic control 31 Type 1 diabetics with uremia
Mean age: 35 yrs.
Mean duration of diabetes: 19 yrs.
7 healthy controls
7 nondiabetic patients with kidney graft and immunosuppression SPK for all diabetics
Oral glucose tolerance test (OGTT),
IV glucose tolerance test (IVGTT),
Determination of plasma insulin and C-peptide concentrations
Follow-up up to 7 yrs.
Insulin-independence for all SPK patients
Insulin levels in SPK group higher than normal but not as high as kidney-grafted group
Patients in both transplanted groups demonstrated mild insulin resistance, probably due to immunosuppression since prednisone is known to induce peripheral insulin resistance and cyclosporin is known to reduce plasma clearance of prednisone, resulting in increased prednisone concentration in plasma.
Pancreas transplantation results in long-term normalization of glucose metabolism but with a degree of insulin resistance attributed to immunosuppression.
Small patient sample Hopt et al. (1991)
40 subjects
Retrospective study to report experience Type I diabetes with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) and advanced retinopathy in all patients, neuropathy and peripheral microangiopathy in 30 patients
Mean age: 39.5 yrs
Mean duration of diabetes: 24.5 yrs
Mean duration on dialysis: 1.9 yrs SPK (same donor) using pancreaticoduodenal graft and bladder drainage method
Immuno: triple drug (azathioprine, cyclosporin, prednisolone) in all patients; addition of ATG in last 16 patients (quadruple drug regimen)
Anticoagulation: Dextran (5 days) and heparin (10 days) followed by aspirin beginning at day 10 Normoglycemia reached in 37 patients (93%) immediately; 3 patients required exogenous insulin in early post-operative period.
3-yr patient survival: 87.5% (2 early deaths due to pyelonephritis and virus-myocarditis; three late post-transplant deaths due to pulmonary embolus, systemic infection, or micro- and macroangiopathy)
1-yr graft survival (pancreas and kidney): 85%
3-yr graft survival:
Pancreas: 85%
Kidney: 75%
Complications:
Pancreatitis: 10 (25%)
Reoperation due to bleeding or hematoma: 6 (15%)
Rejection episodes: 30 (75%)
Improvement in quality of life reported by 
Though patient survival could be improved, late deaths were due to preexisting secondary diabetic lesions.
While postoperative bleeding is low, the authors recommend the use of anticoagulation therapy after pancreas transplantation.
SPK using pancreaticoduodenal grafts and the bladder drainage method is successful and is recommended for treatment of patients with Type I diabetes and ESRD.
Small patient sample Boudreaux et al. (1991)
15 subjects
Retrospective study to report experience Type I diabetes with renal failure, retinopathy, and some degree of neuropathy
All patients dialysis-dependent SPK for 14 patients including 1 who required retransplant of pancreas, PAK for 1 patient
Whole organ grafts with bladder drainage technique
Immuno: cyclosporin, azathioprine, prednisone, and ALG
Anticoagulation: Dextran (4 days) and aspirin (3 mos) in early transplants; aspirin and dipyridamole in later transplants All patients normoglycemic and insulin-independent in recovery room and up to 20 months follow-up
1-20 month survival rates:
Patient: 87%
Kidney graft: 87%
Pancreas graft: 81%
Complications: rejection episodes (17); re-operation for bleeding, bladder leak, or conversion to enteric drainage (3), thrombosis (1), hematuria (5), bladder leak (2), wound infection (2), pneumonia (1), pancreatitis (3), pseudocyst (1), late deaths (2 due to myocardial infarction or cytomegalovirus) Combined pancreas/ kidney transplantation (SPK) is the procedure of choice for insulin-dependent patients with end-stage renal disease and no significant cardiovascular disease.
Small patient sample
CONCLUSIONS: TREATMENT OUTCOMES
Among all the studies reported in this assessment, the one-year patient survival rate ranges from 86% to 100%, the one-year kidney graft survival rate ranges from 84% to 93%, and the one-year pancreas graft survival rate ranges from 68% to 78%, though one small study reported as low as 0% pancreas graft survival.
Retransplantations are associated with a significantly lower one-year pancreas graft survival (42%) as compared with primary transplantations (73%).
Besides retransplantation, pancreas graft survival is also influenced by recipient category, exocrine management techniques, immunosuppressive regimens, number of HLA mismatches, and age over 45 years.
Complications reported include: patient death (up to 14%), surgical complications (up to 51%), rejection (12% to 75%), and nonsurgical infections (up to 43%).
Some of the specific complications among these categories are wound infection, fistulae, re-operation for hemorrhage (15%), anastomotic or bladder leak, pancreatitis (25%), and pseudocyst.
Reasons for pancreas graft failure (22% to 32%) are thrombosis, chronic rejection, pancreatitis, hemorrhage, and patient death.
Mortality (0% to 14%) has been attributed to cardiovascular complications (especially myocardial infarction but also including pulmonary embolus, cerebral hemorrhage, and micro- and macro-angiopathy), amputation, cytomegalovirus, bacterial pneumonia, fungal myocarditis, and systemic infection.
It has been noted that the incidence of venous thrombosis has decreased since the use of University of Wisconsin solution, and the incidence of rejection has decreased with quadruple drug immunosuppressive therapy.
It has also been emphasized that technical factors require further improvement and more intense cardiac work-up for patient selection is recommended.
Insulin-independence was achieved in 68% to 78% of the cases transplanted.
Although pancreas transplantation does not restore a perfectly normal glucose metabolism, it restores it to a degree that is closer to normal than other forms of diabetic therapy, and this metabolic control is sustained over a prolonged period of time.
Either hyperinsulinemia or mild insulin resistance has been noted in many pancreas recipients.
These conditions have been attributed to insulin delivery to the systemic circulation, denervation of the pancreas, and immunosuppression.
It is not known at this time if hyperinsulinemia following pancreas transplantation is harmful.
Although complications are numerous, patient survival rates suggest that pancreas transplantation is a relatively safe procedure, and pancreas graft survival rates indicate that the procedure is effective in achieving near normal glucose control.
REVIEW OF EVIDENCE: ALTERNATIVE TECHNOLOGIES
Insulin Therapy
The American Diabetes Association (ADA) (1993) evaluated the results of the Diabetes Control and Complications Trial (DCCT), which compared blood-glucose control and diabetic complications between diabetic subjects treated either with conventional therapy or tightly monitored and controlled insulin therapy administered by multiple injections or insulin pump (intensive treatment).
Over a study period of about seven years, results of the trial revealed that, compared with conventional treatment, intensive insulin therapy was associated with an approximate 60% reduction in risk for retinopathy, neuropathy, and nephropathy and with a delay in the onset and a slowing of progression of these complications.
However, normalization of blood-glucose values was not achieved with intensive insulin therapy, which resulted in mean glucose values of about 40% above normal limits, a three-fold increase in the incidence of hypoglycemia, and a significant weight gain, which could have adverse effects.
The ADA asserted that, although tight control may not be appropriate for all diabetics, patients should aim for the best level of glucose control they can achieve without undue risks or hazards.
No studies could be found in the available literature comparing insulin therapy, either conventional or tightly controlled, with pancreas transplantation.
While numerous studies report on the differences between successful pancreas grafts with the achievement of insulin-independence, and failed grafts, necessitating exogenous insulin, it is possible that these differences are influenced by the administration of immunosuppressants, which are associated with insulin problems.
While not specifically comparing pancreas transplantation with insulin therapy, the findings of the DCCT demonstrate that improved insulin control results in a delay or slowing of diabetic complications.
Moreover, these findings emphasize the imperfect control of insulin with intensive insulin therapy.
Simultaneous Pancreas/Kidney Transplantation (SPK) Versus Kidney Transplantation Alone (KTA)
In the 1980s, renal transplantation became one of the preferred methods for treating diabetic nephropathy.
Since then, combined pancreas/kidney transplantation has also emerged as a treatment option for this indication.
However, because the combined procedure remains somewhat controversial due to the increased morbidity rate (Stratta et al., 1993a), a few investigators have compared results of the different procedures.
Results from these studies are provided in TABLE 5
Overall, the combined results of these studies indicate that, although one-year patient survival has been similar for SPK and KTA, one-year kidney graft survival rates have been higher with SPK (83.2% to 96%) than those of KTA (71.2% to 80%).
However, SPK is associated with significantly increased hospitalization and rates of readmission and morbidity.
TABLE 5
KIDNEY ALONE OR PANCREAS/KIDNEY TRANSPLANTATION OUTCOMES
Study
Patient Characteristics
Procedure
Protocol
Results
Conclusions
Comments
USRDS* (1992)
3,168 subjects
Retrospective study to compare SPK and KTA
* USRDS: United States Renal Data System Type I diabetics with ESRD, aged 18-45 yrs.
(possibility of some Type II diabetics in KTA group due to imprecise or unavailable data)
SPK patients had shorter delay between ESRD and transplant and were younger than KTA patients.
SPK for 380 patients
KTA for 2,788 patients
Shorter cold ischemia times and improved preservation for donor kidney in SPK group
More HLA mismatches in SPK group 1-yr. patient survival: 90.2% for KTA vs 90.3% for SPK
1-yr. kidney graft survival: 74.8% for KTA vs 83.2% for SKP
Hospitalization: mean 15 days for KTA vs mean 23 days for SPK
Readmissions: 1.82 times per year and 20.13 total days for KTA vs 2.88 times per year and 31.47 for SPK While patient survival is similar in both groups, kidney graft survival is significantly higher in SPK recipients than in KTA recipients; however, SPK is associated with significantly higher post-transplant hospitalization rates, suggesting higher post-transplant morbidity for SPK recipients than for KTA recipients.
Effects of pancreas transplant itself not assessed
Results not adjusted for factors related to transplant success (HLA-matching, time from onset of ESRD to transplant, etc.)
Cheung et al. (1992)
128 subjects
Retrospective study to compare SPK and KTA Type I diabetics with chronic renal failure
Higher proportion of patients 
69 primary cadaver SPK
More aggressive induction immunosuppression for SPK due to tendency for high incidence of acute rejections 1-yr patient survival: 87% for SPK vs 95% for KTA
1-yr graft survival:
80% for SPK vs 86% for KTA
Acute rejection episodes: 72% for SPK vs 39% for KTA
Hospitalization: 23.3 days for SPK vs 13.5 days for KTA,
Readmissions: 2.78 for SPK vs 1.71 for KTA
Significantly higher incidence of complications related to wound problems, bacterial and fungal infections, and urinary tract infections in SPK group For diabetic patients eligible for renal transplant, decision for additional pancreas transplant should rest with patient; however, increased early morbidity and hospital time should be weighed against improved quality of life.
Effects of pancreas transplant itself not assessed
Increase hospitalization for SPK patients attributed to prolonged induction immunosuppression regimen and higher rates of rejection and complications Stratta et al. (1993a)
123 subjects
Prospective study to compare SPK and KTA 92 Type I diabetics either on dialysis (30) or w/o dialysis (62) and 31 nondiabetics
Age-matched KTA for 31 nondiabetics (KTA:non-dm) and 31 diabetics (KTA:dm)
SPK for 31 diabetics w/o dialysis (SPK:nd) and 30 diabetics on dialysis (SPK:d)
Induction therapy with OKT3 differed individually One-year patient, kidney, and pancreas survival, respectively: SPK:ND: 96.8%, 96.8%, 93.5%
SPK:D: 100%, 96.7%, 93.3%
KTA:DM: 87.1%,71%
KTA:non-DM: 100%,74.2%
Morbidity: Hospitalization, readmissions, incidence of rejection, infections, reoperations all higher in SPK groups though not significant
Quality of life improved in 90% of those in SPK groups SPK eliminates the need for dialysis and exogenous insulin, achieves superior metabolic control, and improves quality of life.
Although associated with increased morbidity as compared with KTA, SPK was associated with higher kidney graft survival than KTA.
Proper patient selection can overcome much morbidity associated with SPK with excellent patient and graft survival and potential for complete rehabilitation.
Study limited by possible selection bias
Pancreas Recipient Categories (SPK, PAK, PTA)
Although not technically alternative technologies, the different recipient categories of pancreas transplantation are associated with differences in technique, outcome, and complications, thus, have been included in this section.
An analysis of 3,569 cases reported to the International Pancreas Registry (IPTR) is reported in TABLE 6.
Although patient survival did not differ significantly among the recipient categories, pancreas graft survival was significantly higher in the SPK recipients in both the USA and Europe (75% and 71%, respectively) than in the PAK recipients (48% and 37%, respectively) and the PTA recipients (48% and 26%, respectively).
Analysis of the 2,112 bladder drainage cases in the USA according to recipient category (SPK, PAK, PTA) demonstrated that, while one-year patient survival rates did not differ (91%, 92%, and 91%, respectively), one-year pancreas graft survival was significantly higher in the SPK category at 76% than in the PAK or PTA categories at 47% and 48%, respectively.
One-year kidney graft survival was 85% in the SPK group (Sutherland et al., 1993b).
The incidence of complications, excluding rejection episodes, was found to be higher in the PAK recipient category.
TABLE 7 provides details on technical complications.
TABLE 6
OVERALL ONE-YEAR PATIENT AND GRAFT SURVIVAL RATES
(Reported to IPTR October 1987 to November 1993)
Survival Category USA Europe Other p Values A. Patient (3569 patients) SPK 90% (2,215 patients) 92% (844 patients) 84% (68 patients) 0.01 WC, 0.07 LR PAK 92% (208 patients) 96% (37 patients) --- 0.03 WC, 0.08 LR PTA 91% (150 patients) 89% (40 patients) 100% (7 patients) NS All 91% (2,573 patients) 92% (921 patients) 86% (75 patients) 
TABLE 7
COMPLICATION RATES IN DIFFERENT RECIPIENT CATEGORIES*
BLADDER DRAINED USA CASES Complication SPK
(2,112 patients) PAK
(205 patients) PTA
(147 patients) Thrombosis 132 (6.30%) 26 (12.7%) 16 (10.9%) Bleeding 16 (0.76%) 2 (0.98%) 1 (0.70%) Infection 43 (2.00%) 8 (3.90%) 3 (2.00%) Anastomotic leak 9 (0.40%) 2 (0.98%) -- Pancreatitis 39 (1.80%) 6 (2.90%) 5 (3.40%) Total 239 (11.30%) 44 (21.50%) 25 (17.00%)
* UNOS results reported by Sutherland et al. (1993b)
Additional studies have been included for more details.
Results from these studies are included in TABLE 8.
TABLE 8
STUDY RESULTS: OUTCOMES OF DIFFERENT RECIPIENT CATEGORIES
Study
Patient
Characteristics
Protocols
Results
Conclusions
Comments
Ozaki et al. (1992)
73 subjects
Retrospective study to identify risk factors Type I diabetics with diabetic complications SPK (61 patients)
PAK (6 patients)
PTA (6 patients)
Follow-up 3 to 35 months 1-yr patient and graft survival, respectively:
SPK: 98%, 93%
PAK: 83%, 17%
PTA: 83%, 83%
Complication rate:
SPK: 29.5%
PAK: 100%
PTA: 33.3% Authors speculate that high incidence of problems in PAK group relates to previous long-term immunosuppression and prior history of major infections, now considered a contraindication to PAK transplant, and suspect that poor results in this group are due to patient selection.
Though complications are high in pancreas transplantation, especially in PAK, an aggressive surgical approach can result in better graft survival.
Small patient sample, especially for PAK and PTA groups Sutherland et al. (1994)
78 subjects
Retrospective study to report experience with PTA Nonuremic Type I diabetics with labile diabetes 102 PTA procedures (78 primary and 24 retransplants)
87 cadaver and 15 LRD grafts
Bladder drainage in 89 and enteric drainage in 13 1-yr. patient and graft survival (insulin-independence):
95% and 54%, respectively
Graft loss due to technical failure (thrombosis or infection) in 12% of the cases
Lower rejection rate with LRD vs cadaver (90% vs 57% 1-yr graft survival) Successful PTA is effective in improving quality of life.
While PTA is associated with low morbidity and mortality, overall success rates are not as high as other recipient categories; however, because LRD transplant results in a lower rejection rate, minimizing HLA mismatches can improve PTA results.
Small patient sample Sollinger et al. (1993)
200 subjects
Retrospective study to report experience Type I uremic diabetics SPK for all patients Patient, kidney graft, and pancreas graft survival (insulin-independence), respectively:
1-yr: 96.55%, 89.73%, 87.51%
5-yr: 90.2%, 80.3%, and 78.6%
Total of 54 surgical complications and 678 infectious episodes with urinary tract infection most frequent type
At least 1 rejection episode in 85.5% patients
Readmissions for 90.5% of patients, mostly due to rejection and infection episodes While cost and morbidity are higher with SPK than with KTA, the improved quality of life associated with insulin-independence in SPK recipients and the good patient and graft survival rates are reasons to consider SPK therapeutic and effective.
Duct Management Techniques
The technique used for exocrine duct management also has been shown to influence pancreas graft survival, although kidney graft survival and patient survival are similar among all the echniques used.
An analysis of the IPTR data pertaining to exocrine duct management, which ncludes UNOS data, is shown in TABLE 9.
Because the duct injection (DI) method was only sed in 1 USA and 2 Other recipients, these cases were not included in the analysis.
TABLE 9
OUTCOMES OF DIFFERENT DUCT MANAGEMENT TECHNIQUES*
(Reported to IPTR October 1987 to November 1993)
Survival Category USA Europe Other p Values A. Patient
(3094 patients) BD (2,698) 91% (2,112 patients) 93% (522 patients) 87% (64 patients) 0.17 WC, 0.04 LR DI (249) --- (1 patient) 93% (246 patients) --- (2 patients) ED (147)
Rous (95)
No rous (52) 82% (78 patients)
87% (46 patients)
75% (32 patients) 86% (67 patients)
80% (47 patients)
100% (20 patients) 100% (2 patients) 100% (2 patients)
--- NS
NS
0.011 All (3,094) 90% (2,191 patients) 92% (835 patients) 84% (68 patients) 0.06 B. Pancreas Graft BD 76% 77% 80% NS DI --- 61% --- ED
Rous
No rous 57%
60%
54% 62%
54%
84% 100%
100%
--- NS
NS 0.02 All 75% 64% 79% 0.02 WC, 0.36 LR C. Kidney Graft BD 85% 84% 86% NS DI --- 89% --- ED
Rous
No rous 75%
78%
71% 71%
64%
89% 100%
100%
--- NS
NS
NS All 84% 84% 83%
* Only for cadaver SPK transplants (reported by Sutherland et al., 1993b) BD (bladder drainage), DI (duct injection), ED (enteric drainage)
Results from individual studies do not all concur that the bladder drainage method provides the best outcomes.
Data from additional studies comparing these surgical techniques are provided in TABLE 10.
To summarize these studies, regarding exocrine duct management techniques, while one-year patient survival rates and kidney graft survival rates are similar for all methods, (82% to 93% and 84% to 86%, respectively, one-year pancreas graft survival rates are higher for the bladder drainage method (76% to 80%) than those for the enteric drainage method (71% to 75%) and significantly higher than those for the duct injection method (61%).
However, some investigators have noted that the frequency of rejection episodes is higher with the bladder drainage method.
TABLE 10
STUDY RESULTS: OUTCOMES OF DIFFERENT DUCT MANAGEMENT TECHNIQUES
Study
Patient
Characteristics
Procedure Protocol
Results
Conclusions
Comments
Hillebrand et al. (1991)
44 subjects
Retrospective study to report experience Type I diabetes and end-stage renal disease (ESRD) Simultaneous pancreas/kidney (SPK); with duct occlusion (25 patients: Group I) or bladder drainage technique (19 patients: Group II); Rejection episodes:
7 DI patients(28%)
14 BD patients(74%)
Renal graft loss due to death or rejection:
3 DI
5 BD
2-yr. renal graft survival:
83% DI
66% BD The bladder drainage method (Grp.II) resulted in a higher incidence of renal rejection, post-operative renal failure (11% vs 0% for Grp.I, and use of OKT3 (58% vs 20% for Grp.I) than the duct occlusion method.
Small patient sample
Little data on patient selection criteria Illner et al. (1991)
102 subjects
Retrospective study to report on experience No data on patient characteristics Segment of pancreas and prolamine duct occlusion for all patients 9-yr survival:
patient: 85%
pancreas: 38%
kidney: 54%
Non-immunological complications:
pancreatic fistulae (32%)
pancreatic pseudocysts (5%)
venous thrombosis (13%) While non-immunological complications are frequent and often result in loss of graft function in the early after transplantation, pancreas transplant using the duct occlusion technique is reasonably safe and effective.
No data on patient selection criteria
Insufficient reporting of details and results Tydén et al. (1991)
107 subjects
Retrospective study to report experience with enteric exocrine diversion method Type I diabetes in all patients
81 uremic patients
26 nonuremic patients with
hyperlabile diabetes (5), progressive angiopathy (1), neuropathy (2), preuremic nephropathy (16), or retinopathy (2) Enteric exocrine diversion method: pancreatico-duodenal grafts with removable catheter
1-yr patient and pancreas graft survival, respectively:
Overall with enteric exocrine diversion:
95%, 49% (1986-87)
87%, 49% (1988-90) The risk of enteric leakage has basically been eliminated with the use of pancreatic duct catheter.
While the results of this drainage method are satisfactory and similar to those of earlier combined pancreas/kidney transplants, graft function is often lost due to technical complications or chronic rejection.
Insufficient data on patient selection process
Martin et al. (1991)
182 subjects
Retrospective study to compare different drainage techniques Type I diabetes and neuropathy in all patients, with retinopathy (178), macroangiopathy (71), and/or myocardiopathy (62) PTA for all patients; segmental grafts with neoprene duct occlusion, duodeno-pancreatic grafts with enteric diversion, or duodeno-pancreatic grafts with bladder drainage Overall 5-yr survival of pancreas transplants (not clear if this is graft or patient survival): 45%
Surgical complications requiring re-operation: 6 in patients with enteric drainage, 1 in patients with duct occlusion The use of urinary amylases as a marker for pancreas rejection was disappointing.
While a higher rate of surgical complications occurred after enteric drainage, graft function is similar no matter which surgical technique is used.
Longer follow-up is necessary to determine the best surgical technique.
Some results not reported clearly Königsrainer et al. (1991b)
54 subjects
Retrospective study to report experience Type I diabetes
Mean age:
36.3 yrs (Group I:
delayed duct occlusion)
36.9 yrs (Group II:
bladder drainage) Segmental graft with tail and parts of head of the gland, including delayed duct (DD) occlusion in 16 patients and bladder drainage (BD) in 38 patients
1-yr survival for DD and BD, respectively:
patient: 94%, 90%
pancreas: 72%, 74%
kidney: 93%, 89%
Mortality:
12.5% (2) in DD group, 15.7% (6) in BD group Duct occlusion is preferred to the bladder drainage as it prevents further damage early after the transplant and allows precise monitoring of the exocrine functions.
Small patient sample Brekke (1991)
75 subjects
Retrospective study to compare techniques Diabetics (type not specified)
Prior to 1988, patients with history of cerebrovascular insult, coronary heart disease, and gangrene included; since then excluded Segmental graft with neoprene duct occlusion before 1988, whole organ graft with duodeno-pancreatic cystostomy since 1988 1-yr patient survival:
PAK: 100%
SPK: 93% - (4 deaths)
PTA: 100 % (1 death 5
yrs. post-transplant)
1-yr pancreas graft survival:
PTA: 33% (6 lost function)
PAK: 0% (all due to
chronic rejection)
SPK: Not specified Bladder drainage allows for monitoring of urinary amylase excretion to detect pancreas rejection but results in a high rate of graft loss; 2-year graft survival rates were improved with whole, rather than segmental, grafts using the bladder drainage method.
Small patient sample
Insufficient data on patient selection criteria
Incomplete reporting of results
CONCLUSIONS: ALTERNATIVE TECHNOLOGIES In summary, a review of the published literature reveals the following with respect to alternative technologies: * Intensive insulin therapy, while resulting in improvement with respect to glucose values and diabetic complications as compared with conventional therapy, is associated with increased incidence of hypoglycemia and has not been compared in a controlled trial with pancreas transplantation.
* Compared with KTA, SPK results in improved kidney graft survival; however, it is associated with significantly increased hospitalization, readmission, and morbidity.
* With respect to recipient category of pancreas transplantation, SPK has been found to result in improved pancreas graft survival rates and decreased complication rates, when compared with PTA or PAK, which is associated with the highest complication rates.
* While the bladder drainage method of exocrine duct management has resulted in improved pancreas graft survival, as compared with other techniques, it is also associated with increased complication rates.
Based upon this information, it is difficult to form confident conclusions regarding the most appropriate treatment modality for the treatment of Type 1 diabetics with problems relating to exogenous insulin or with a propensity toward diabetic complications.
While pancreas transplantation has been found effective in controlling glucose metabolism, which may be better than the degree of control possible with intensive insulin therapy, it is associated with a significant incidence of complications, which must be weighed against the benefits of glucose control and the consequent potential for some degree of prevention or delay of secondary diabetic complications.
Combined pancreas/kidney transplantation appears to be more appropriate than kidney transplantation alone for uremic diabetics since it allows amelioration of both uremia and glucose control problems with one surgical procedure and is associated with improved kidney graft survival.
However, once again, the increased incidence of morbidity with combined pancreas/kidney transplantation must be weighed against these benefits.
It has not been firmly established that pancreas transplantation is more appropriate than either exogenous insulin therapy or KTA or the treatment of Type 1 diabetes.
With respect to alternatives within pancreas transplantation itself, SPK and the bladder drainage method are associated with improved pancreas graft survival rates when compared with other recipient categories and techniques for exocrine duct management, respectively.
However, SPK is not appropriate for nonuremic diabetics, and PAK is recommended over SPK for uremic patients who have the option of living related donors for the kidney graft, which results in a decreased incidence of rejection.
Improved HLA antigen matching, when living related donors are not an option, also can result in a decreased incidence of rejection.
Moreover, regarding the exocrine duct management technique, while the bladder drainage method is the preferred method in the USA, it is also associated with an increased incidence of complications.
REVIEW OF EVIDENCE: NET HEALTH OUTCOME
Retinopathy
In this technology assessment, five studies are reviewed that assess the effects of pancreas transplantation on retinopathy.
Data from these studies are provided in TABLE 11.
Pancreas transplantation was not found to have a discernible beneficial effect on diabetic retinopathy.
Although stabilization of retinopathy was observed after transplantation, a number of the patients achieving stabilization also required laser coagulation, thus the stabilization cannot be attributed solely to transplantation.
In addition, progression of retinopathy, probably due to irreversible lesions caused by advanced diabetes, occurred in many patients.
Several investigators speculated that in order to prevent secondary complications, pancreas transplantation must be performed at an early stage of the disease.
TABLE 11
HEALTH OUTCOMES: RETINOPATHY
Study
Patient Characteristics
Methodology
Results
Conclusions
Comments
Königsrainer et al. (1991a)
39 subjects
Prospective study to assess the effects of pancreas transplantation on the course of retinopathy All patients had undergone SPK or PAT, including 25 with functioning pancreas graft (Group 1) and 14 with non-functioning graft (Group 2)
Pretransplant panretinal laser coagulation: 20 in Group 1, 10 in Group 2
Inhomogeneous renal function in Group 2 Complete eye examination prior to transplantation and at 4 to 6 month intervals thereafter; retinopathy graded by early treatment diabetic retinopathy study system (ETDRS) protocol
Total eyes analyzed: 45 in Group 1, 26 in Group 2 Group 1:
Stabilization of retinopathic lesions in 33 eyes (73.3%), improvement in 4 eyes (8.8%), deterioration in 8 eyes (17.7%)
Group 2:
Stabilization in 14 eyes (54%), deterioration in 12 eyes (46%) Successful pancreas transplantation can have a positive effect on the course of diabetic retinopathy, especially if performed early in the course of the disease; however, it is not usually performed until organs and tissues have already been severely damaged.
Small patient sample
Zech et al. (1991)
18 subjects
Prospective study to assess the effect of pancreas transplantation on retinopathy All patients had successful SPK and proliferative retinopathy prior to transplant.
Blindness in 5 eyes and cataracts removed in two patients prior to transplant Complete ophthalmological examination prior to transplant, at 6 months and 12 months after transplant, yearly thereafter
Follow-up period up to at least 4 years Stabilization in 12 cases (66%) with supplementary photocoagulation required in 7
Progression in 4 cases (22%) leading to blindness (2) or vitreous hemorrhage despite photocoagulation (2)
Improvement in 1 patient without photocoagulation While retinopathy stabilized in most patients, it cannot be attributed solely to transplantation since photocoagulation was usually required.
Progression of retinopathy in some patients was probably due to irreversible microangiopathic lesions caused by advanced diabetes.
SPK was not effective in reversing the clinical/angiopathic signs of retinopathy.
Small study sample
No control group Bandello et al. (1991)
32 subjects
Prospective study to assess benefits of normoglycemia on diabetic retinopathy 20 patients with successful SPK and good metabolic control throughout the study
12 controls with successful KTA and good metabolic control with insulin therapy
19 eyes in study group (48.7%) and 11 eyes in control group (47.8%) not included in study due to end-stage retinopathy at baseline, laser treatment, cataract extraction, ischemic optic neuropathy, or cytomegalovirus endophthalmitis Complete ophthalmological examinations prior to transplant, at 6 and 9 months after transplant, yearly thereafter
Follow-up period up to 
Reduction of macular edema and capillary closure in 2 eyes in study group and 2 eyes in control group
Augmented capillary closure in 2 eyes in control group
No significant change in visual acuity in either group Although better glycemic control was achieved after pancreas transplantation, diabetic retinopathy was already too far advanced to benefit from this improved control.
Pancreas transplantation cannot be expected to exert a beneficial effect on retinopathy unless it is performed earlier in the stage of the disease.
Small study sample Scheider et al. (1991)
45 subjects
Prospective study to assess effect of pancreas transplantation on diabetic retinopathy SPK for all patients, including 30 patients (57 eyes) with both grafts functioning and 15 controls (26 eyes) with only kidney graft functioning
Laser coagulation received by 81% of study group and 85% of control group prior to transplant
Subgroup of patients not receiving laser coagulation included 14 eyes in study group and 6 eyes originally in study group but moved to control group due to late pancreas rejection (12, 17, or 33 months post-transplant) Complete ophthalmological examination every 6 months to 12 months
ETDRS protocol
Independent evaluation by two examiners
Mean observation: 38 months Most eyes stabilized with no significant difference in retinopathy scores between main study and control groups
Decreases and increases in visual acuity not related to retina and mostly due to clearing or clouding of optical pathway (vitreous hemorrhage or cataracts)
In subgroup without laser coagulation, mean retinopathy score remained stable in study group but decreased 2.8 points in control group due to sudden onset of massive proliferation during first two years after rejection Stable condition of most eyes due to laser coagulation performed prior to transplant.
Periods of destabilization resulted in worsened retinopathy in patients not receiving coagulation who lost function of the pancreas graft.
Tighter blood sugar control can ameliorate retinopathy but pancreas transplant has no positive effect on late-stage retinopathy.
As long as pancreas transplantation is limited to late-stage diabetics, no definite statement can be made regarding the pancreas-eye relation.
Small patient sample Sutherland (1992)
400 subjects
Retrospective review of effect of pancreas transplantation on diabetic complications Type I diabetic uremic (240) and nonuremic (160) patients 160 (40%) PTA
120 (30%) PAK
120 (30%) SPK
Follow-up 1,2,3 1/2, 5, 7 1/2, and 10 years
Successful graft recipients compared with failed graft recipients Incidence of events such as vitreous hemorrhage similar in all patients
30% advanced to higher grade of retinopathy after which those with successful grafts stabilized and those with failed grafts deteriorated Pancreas transplantation has no discernible effect on retinopathy.
Macro- and Microcirculation
Several studies were evaluated that assessed the effect of pancreas transplantation on diabetic cardiovascular complications.
Overall, improvement in skin microcirculation was observed in some patients and improved ventricular filling was observed in others following pancreas transplantation.
However, there is some question as to whether many of the adverse circulation effects prior to transplantation were due to impaired kidney function, hypertension, or glycemic control, and as to whether improvement in circulation can be attributed to pancreas transplantation, kidney transplantation, or effects on blood flow from immunosuppressants or other drugs.
While these investigators believe that pancreas transplantation can positively affect microangiopathy, they also note that further studies are required.
In addition, because better improvement was seen in patients with better microvascular preconditions, some investigators have recommended that transplantation be performed earlier in the course of diabetes for better results.
Data from these studies is provided in TABLE 12.
TABLE 12
HEALTH OUTCOMES: MACRO- AND MICROANGIOPATHY
Study
Patient Characteristics
Methodology
Results
Conclusions
Comments
Nyberg et al. (1991a)
28 subjects
Prospective study to assess the effect of pancreas transplantation on diabetic cardiovascular complications 14 patients with functioning kidney and pancreas grafts and 14 patients with functioning kidney graft only and exogenous insulin therapy
Immunosuppressive regimen same for both groups
Blood pressure normal or normalized with 1 to 4 antihypertensive drugs per patient Two-dimensional, M-mode, color-, pulsed-and continuous wave Doppler echocardiographic studies Both groups: slight but similar increase in interventricular septal thickness probably due to long-standing hypertension and periods of fluid overload before kidney transplantation, left ventricular mass equal, left systolic function normal and well-preserved, isovolumic relaxation and deceleration time similar
No difference between groups except in ratio between peak flow velocity in atrial systole and that in early filling (A/E ratio), which was above the upper normal range in 8 of 14 kidney-grafted patients and 4 of 14 pancreas-grafted patients, indicating more frequent occurrence of impaired diastolic filling in kidney only recipients.
It appears that many effects on cardiac function are consequences of hypertension and impaired kidney function though increased A/E ratio may be caused by diabetes itself.
While pancreas transplantation may result in improved ventricular diastolic filling, follow-up is necessary to determine if diastolic dysfunction increases and if it is related to increased cardiovascular mortality in diabetic patients with kidney transplants.
Small patient sample Abendroth et al. (1991)
45 subjects
Prospective study to assess the effects of pancreas transplantation on peripheral microcirculation and long-term outcome All Type 1 diabetics with late secondary complications, including 28 patients with successful SPK (Group 1) and 17 patients with kidney alone transplantation (Group 2)
Different immunosuppressive regimens for both groups Measurement of transcutaneous oxygen pressure (tcpO[2]) by skin surface electrode and measurement of re-oxygenation time by cuff after 3 minutes of blood flow occlusion compared with values of 86 healthy controls, and measurement of erythrocyte flow by laser speckle method (similar to Doppler flow technique) compared with that of 31 healthy controls
Mean follow up: 49 months (Group 1) and 43 months (Group 2) TcpO[2] (normal: 79 mmHg, mean): increase in Group 1 from mean 46 mmHg to mean 63 mmHg, no improvement in Group 2 from mean 44 mmHg to mean 41 mmHg
Re-oxygenation time (normal: 79 seconds, mean): decrease from mean 224 seconds to mean 114 seconds in Group 1, increase from mean 219 seconds to mean 244 seconds in Group 2
Relative blood flow (normal: 6.1 relative units, mean): rise from mean 4.2 relative units to mean 5.6 relative units in Group 1, no improvement in Group 2
Amputation less frequent in Group 1 (5 events) than in Group 2 (9 events) After solitary kidney transplantation, patients showed a marked impairment of skin microcirculation as compared with patients after SPK transplantation, suggesting that improved glycemic control, not kidney function, is responsible for the improvement in microvascular reactivity.
More pronounced improvement in microcirculation was seen in patients with better microvascular preconditions.
Pancreas transplantation can positively affect diabetic microangiopathy, though grafting should be performed much earlier in the course of diabetes.
Small patient sample Jörneskog et al. (1991)
18 subjects
Prospective study to assess effects of pancreas transplantation on functional microangiopathy of the skin 9 Type 1 diabetics with severe late diabetic complications and successful kidney/pancreas grafts and no exogenous insulin
9 healthy age-matched controls Videophotometric capillaroscopy and laser Doppler fluxmetry (LD) used to determine blood cell velocity (CBV) and skin microcirculation, respectively, both at rest and during post-occlusive reactive hyperaemia at 2 months and 38 months post-transplant In comparison with controls:
Resting and peak CBV and DF values of study group not significantly different at 2 months but increased significantly at 38 months
Time to maximal CBV during hyperaemia of study group impaired at 2 months and more prolonged at 38 months
Time to peak LD similar in both groups at 2 months and unchanged at 38 months
Ability to decrease blood flow during venous occlusion impaired in study group at 2 months but improved in 4 patients at 38 months
Skin temperature similar in both groups throughout study
Finger blood pressure higher in study group at 2 months but decreased in all but one patient at 38 months at Compared with test results at 2 months post-transplant, results at 38 months indicate a successive increase in skin microcirculation in diabetics after successful SPK grafting, possibly due to improvement of hemmorheological factors, decrease of vascular resistance, or effects of immunosuppressants or other drugs on blood flow
Impairment of microvascular reactivity possibly caused by disturbed function of smooth muscle cells resulting from structural changes in vessel wall due to long-standing diabetes
Impairment in ability to decrease flow during venous occlusion probably due to neuropathy and improvement in 4 of 5 patients with the most impaired reflex may indicate improved nerve function in these patients patients Small patient sample
No other conclusions drawn regarding pancreas transplantation
Neuropathy
The effects of pancreas transplantation on neuropathy were investigated in seven studies reported in TABLE 13.
To summarize, the results of these studies show that pancreas transplantation resulted in improvement or stabilization of sensory, motor, and autonomic indices.
In particular, increases in nerve conduction velocities and inspiration/expiration ratios, reduction in tachycardia, and improvement in gastrointestinal and thermoregulatory symptoms were observed.
However, these overall improvements, for the most part, were only minimal, and it has been speculated that improvement may possibly be increased with transplantation at an earlier stage in neuropathy.
While one investigator asserted that pancreas transplantation does not clearly reverse cardiovascular autonomic neuropathy, the consensus is that pancreas transplantation halts the progression of neuropathy and autonomic dysfunction.
TABLE 13
HEALTH OUTCOMES: NEUROPATHY
Study
Patient Characteristics
Methodology
Results
Conclusions
Comments
Vial et al. (1991)
20 subjects
Prospective study to assess the effect of successful SPK transplantation on the long-term evolution of diabetic polyneuropathy Long-standing Type 1 diabetics with terminal diabetic neuropathy (motor and sensory nerve conduction velocities and amplitudes decreased)
All underwent successful SPK transplantation and no longer required dialysis or exogenous insulin Motor nerve conductions measured electrophysiologically and motor and sensory nerve action potentials calculated in each nerve prior to grafting and at yearly intervals at 1 year (18 patients), 2 years (16), 3 years (10), and 4 years (5) post-transplant Motor nerve velocity scores: no significant improvement except in median nerve at 1 year, significant gain of 7.7% at 2 years, gain of 12.3%
at 4 years
Sensory nerve velocity scores: small gain each year but significant only at 1 year (4.9% gain in sural and median nerves) and 2 years (7.1% gain in median nerves)
Motor nerve amplitude scores: 4.2% gain (not significant) at 2 years
Sensory nerve amplitude scores: 8.1% gain (significant) at 2 years
Significant improvement in motor and sensory conduction velocities and slight but not significant improvement in motor and sensory amplitudes were observed in recipients of successful SPK grafts, with the maximal gain occurring after 2 years post-transplant, then stabilizing.
The delay of maximal improvement excludes metabolic or toxic effects of grafting as the sole contributing factor.
Diabetic patients have a limited potential for reinnervation due to the long duration of diabetes and polyneuropathy.
Small patient sample Comi et al. (1991)
25 subjects
Prospective study to assess the role of hyperglycemia and uremia in neuropathy All patients Type 1 diabetics, including 16 who underwent combined pancreas/ kidney grafting (KP group) and 9 who underwent only kidney grafting (K group)
Mean age, duration of diabetes, and time on dialysis similar in both groups Neurophysiologic studies on nerve conduction velocities, muscle action potentials, and sensory action potentials conducted prior to transplantation and at follow-up of 1 year for all patients and of 2 years for 12 KP patients and 6 K patients Slight increase in amplitude of motor and sensory action potentials in upper extremity observed in current study suggests nerve fiber regeneration may occur in less damaged nerves.
Improvement in nerve conduction parameters observed in both groups at 1-year follow-up, with changes statistically significant only for KP group
Continued improvement observed in KP group but not in K group at 2-year follow-up Improvement of peripheral neuropathy may be due to elimination of uremia in period immediately following transplantation but continued improvement beyond that period is due to persistent normoglycemic state Small patient sample Navarro et al. (1991)
232 subjects
Prospective study to assess effect of pancreas transplantation on cardiorespiratory reflex (CRR) tests and assess utility of CRR tests as predictor of prognosis and survival All Type 1 diabetics, including 95 ungrafted patients and 137 patients who had undergone PAK, PTA, or SPK, of whom 72 retained function of pancreas graft and 65 lost function of pancreas graft within 3 months post-transplant Cardiorespiratory tests performed at initial visit and at follow-up of 1 to 7 years CRR tests normal in 57 patients and abnormal in 175
Overall mortality: 23.4% of 175 with abnormal CRR, 3.5% of 57 with normal CRR
Among those with abnormal CRR, patients with functioning pancreas graft had better survival rates than those with failed graft, and in long-term follow-up, than those ungrafted
Repeat testing in 47 functioning-graft patients and 36 failed- or ungrafted patients showed unchanged or improved CRR values in former group and significantly worsened autonomic dysfunction with time in latter group Successful pancreas transplantation offers diabetic patients with autonomic neuropathy the best chance of prolonged survival and prevention of progressive decline in cardiorespiratory reflex function.
No conclusive comments on utility of CRR tests Müller-Felber et al. (1991)
53 subjects
Prospective study to assess effect of pancreas/kidney
grafting on diabetic polyneuropathy Type 1 diabetics who had undergone pancreas/kidney grafting, including 9 who lost function of kidney graft at 30.4 months (mean) post-transplant, and 14 who lost function of pancreas graft 17.3 months (mean) post-transplant
61% had at least one symptom of neuropathy prior to transplant Standardized questionnaire, neurological examination, and electrophysiological studies beginning 4.4 months (mean) post-transplant and every 6 months thereafter
Mean follow-up: 40.3 months Overall, improvements in symptoms of polyneuropathy were reported and increases in nerve conduction velocities were observed though no change was noted in muscle-force, sensation, or tendon-reflexes.
Nerve conduction velocities decreased, though not significantly,
during the first year after kidney-graft rejection, while they primarily did not decrease until after the first year following pancreas-graft rejection, then decreased significantly.
The increase in nerve conduction velocities following pancreas/ kidney transplant and the long-term effect of pancreas-graft rejection on nerve conduction velocities indicate that strict normalization of glucose metabolism can positively influence the course of progressive diabetic polyneuropathy, which may be stabilized or partially reversed after successful grafting.
Small patient sample
Evaluation of symptoms based upon subjective responses
Nusser et al. (1991)
39 subjects
Prospective study to assess effect of functioning pancreas graft on autonomic neuropathy Type 1 diabetics who underwent pancreas/ kidney transplantation, including 26 with both grafts functioning and no exogenous insulin (PK group) and 13 who lost function of pancreas graft within 3 months post-transplant (KA group)
Triple drug immunosuppression for all Standardized questionnaire and measurement of heart rate variation during various maneuvers every 6 to 12 months post-transplant
Follow-up for up to 3 years in some patients Significant reduction in tachycardia in PK group at 1- and 2- year follow-up; slight decrease in tachycardia and increase in expiration/inspiration ratio in KA group at 1-yr follow-up; no differences between groups and no changes during follow-up in other parameters of cardiorespiratory reflex
Greater improvement in gastrointestinal and thermoregulatory symptoms in PK group; deterioration of hypoglycemia awareness in 33% of KA group Successful pancreas grafting can result in long-term normalization of glucose metabolism, which can prevent progression of autonomic dysfunction.
Since improvements are only minimal and no change may occur in severe lesions, marked improvements may only be seen in patients undergoing transplant at an earlier stage of neuropathy.
Pancreas transplantation is also beneficial in eliminating unawareness of life-threatening hypoglycemic attacks.
Small patient sample
Subjective evaluation of symptoms Boucek et al. (1991)
19 subjects
Prospective study to assess the effect of pancreas transplantation on autonomic neuropathy Type 1 diabetics with end-stage diabetic nephropathy, including 9 with successful pancreas/ kidney grafting and no exogenous insulin and 10 with only a kidney graft and insulin therapy
Triple drug immunosuppression for all
10 healthy age-matched controls for comparison of pretransplant autonomic nervous system Standard cardiovascular function tests and blood pressure tests prior to transplant and 6 to 24 months post-transplant
7 patients in pancreas/kidney grafted group re-examined at 2 to 4 years Abnormal results well below lower limits of normal as compared to healthy subjects and no significant differences between grafted groups
No changes observed in either group other than small but not significant increase in expiration/ inspiration ratio in kidney-grafted group during entire study period
Trend toward improvement in symptoms subjectively evaluated Lack of improvement probably due to extensive and irreversible structural nerve damage
Pancreas transplantation does not clearly reverse cardiovascular autonomic neuropathy Small patient sample
Sutherland (1992)
400 subjects
Retrospective review of effect of pancreas transplantation on diabetic complications Type I diabetic uremic (240) and nonuremic (160) patients 160 (40%) PTA
120 (30%) PAK
120 (30%) SPK
Follow-up 1,2,3 1/2, 5, 7 1/2, and 10 years
Successful graft recipients compared with failed graft recipients Improvement or stabilization of sensory, motor, and autonomic indices in successful graft patients; decline in indices in failed graft patients
Reduced mortality in patients with severe neuropathy who had successful graft compared with those untransplanted or those in failed graft group (70%, 35%, 40%, respectively, alive at 6 yrs) Pancreas transplantation not only halts the progression of neuropathy but reduces the mortality risk in those with severe neuropathy.
Nephropathy
Two studies were found in the available literature that explored the specific health outcome of the effects of pancreas transplantation on diabetic nephropathy.
While it appears that the procedure may have a beneficial effect, more information is needed to form a definite conclusion.
Data from these studies are provided in TABLE 14.
TABLE 14
HEALTH OUTCOMES: NEPHROPATHY
Study
Patient Characteristics
Methodology
Results
Conclusions
Comments
Sutherland (1992)
400 subjects
Retrospective review of effect of pancreas transplantation on diabetic complications Type I diabetic uremic (240) and nonuremic (160) patients 160 (40%) PTA
120 (30%) PAK
120 (30%) SPK
Follow-up 1,2,3 1/2, 5, 7 1/2, and 10 years
Successful graft recipients compared with failed graft recipients Renal graft mesangial volume significantly less in successful graft group than in those with failed graft or those with KTA Correction of diabetes with pancreas transplantation appears to halt the progression of or prevent the appearance of nephropathy.
No statistics provided to show patient numbers or percentages Bilous et al. (1989)
12 subjects
Retrospective study to assess effects of pancreas transplantation on transplanted kidneys 12 Type 1 diabetics with uremia PAK for all
Biopsy specimens obtained from functional kidney grafts before and 1.9 or more years after pancreas transplantation
Results compared with biopsy specimens from 13 age-matched KTA recipients No significant changes in any structural measure of the glomerulus after pancreas transplantation, though, compared with KTA group, PAK group had smaller glomerular volumes and markedly less expansion of the mesangium, the glomerular lesion most closely related to the development of diabetic nephropathy).
Although the results demonstrate that normoglycemia achieved with pancreas transplantation can prevent the progression of diabetic glomerulopathy, it remains to be seen if this is also possible with optimal regimens of exogenous insulin therapy.
Small patient sample
Quality of Life
Some controversy surrounds the methodology for measuring quality of life with some experts preferring structured inpatient interviews or evaluation by a physician and others preferring self-administered questionnaires (Piehlmeier et al., 1991).
Although the quality of life cannot be determined by the usual scientific laboratory and clinical measurements, the potential improvements in daily life style must be balanced against the risks of surgery and immunosuppressive drugs and steroids.
Summaries of available studies evaluating quality of life are provided in TABLE 15
Results from these studies indicate that pancreas transplantation is effective in improving the quality of life in Type 1 diabetics.
It must be noted, however, that all the studies are limited by small patient samples and, with the exception of the study by Milde et al. (1992), by the sole use of subjective questionnaires.
All investigators have reported more positive responses and outlooks with respect to overall satisfaction with life, well-being, social life, overall health, and physical activities, from recipients of a functioning pancreas graft as opposed to those with a nonfunctioning graft or those on insulin therapy.
While most functioning-graft recipients feel as though their quality of life has improved since transplantation, poor results with respect to employment were noted, although satisfaction with disability pension was one reason given for not returning to work.
Further studies with objective determinations of quality of life are required in order to form a solid conclusion regarding the benefits of pancreas transplantation on quality of life.
TABLE 15
STUDY RESULTS: QUALITY OF LIFE
Study
Patient Characteristics
Methodology
Results
Conclusions
Comments
Zehrer and Gross (1991)
131 subjects
Retrospective study to assess quality of life in pancreas transplant recipients All Type I diabetic recipients of pancreas transplants, including 65 insulin-independent subjects with functioning graft (FG) and 66 insulin-dependent subjects with nonfunctioning graft (NFG) Self-administered questionnaire regarding demographics, subjective quality of life indicators, and diabetes-specific symptoms and attitudes
Most questions answered with 5-point or 7-point scale FG NFG
Current health:
Excellent 10% 0%
Good 61% 23%
Fair 26% 48%
Poor 3% 28%
Health since transplant:
Better 89% 25%
Worse 6% 37%
Same 5% 39%
Satisfied with life: 68% 48%
Able to care for self
and daily activities: 78% 56%
Satisfied with
transplant decision: 89% 72%
FG group felt managing transplant and taking immunosuppressive medication easier than managing diabetes and taking insulin (92%); felt diabetes was more demanding of family time and energy than transplant (63%); and reported benefits of transplant Results of the study demonstrate that recipients of successful pancreas transplantation feel that their quality of life is much improved as a result of the transplant; however, prospective long-term studies with pretransplant baselines and diabetic controls not desiring transplants are required to determine the magnitude of benefits and potential negative effects.
Subjective study with
limited ability to attribute attitudes solely to transplantation Piehlmeier et al. (1991)
157 subjects
Prospective study to compare quality of life after successful kidney and/or pancreas transplantation with that of diabetic subjects with or without dialysis prior to transplantation and patients after failure of kidney and/or pancreas graft Type I diabetes with severe late complications, including 29 pre-transplant patients without dialysis (Group A), 44 pre-transplant patients with dialysis (Group B), 31 post-transplant patients with functioning pancreas/kidney (Group C), 29 post-transplant patients with functioning kidney and insulin therapy (Group D), 15 post-transplant patients with dialysis and insulin (Group E), 9 patients after pancreas alone transplant with good renal function and insulin Diabetes-specific self-administered questionnaire regarding relevant components of quality of life (vocational situation, impairment by treatment or medication, physical and mental status, emotional situation, leisure time and social activities, and partnership, family life, and sex life) Groups C and D (post-transplant with functioning kidney and functioning pancreas or insulin) had the most positive responses and the highest scores not only in overall rating but also in quality of life components, particularly depression, physical capacity, and leisure time and sexual activities.
Group C scores were highest but not significantly different than those of Group D.
Poor results were found regarding vocational situation with only 38% of those in Group C and D working.
Successful pancreas and/or kidney transplantation results in improved quality of life for recipients as compared with pretransplant subjects or subjects with unsuccessful grafts.
Though not seen in all components of quality of life, a functioning pancreas leads to further improvement.
Small subgroup samples
Cross-sectional study with potential selection bias and time/generation effects
Subjective study Milde et al. (1992)
44 subjects
Retrospective study to assess quality of life in successful and failed pancreas transplant recipients All sighted Type I diabetics who received pancreas/kidney transplant six months or longer prior to study and were not hospitalized at time of study, including 31 successful pancreas and kidney graft recipients and 13 successful kidney graft but failed pancreas graft recipients
All on immunosuppressive therapy 11 self-administered questionnaires used previously with transplant and/or dialysis patients No significant differences found between groups with respect to physical function, physical symptoms, emotional or mental state, or sense of well-being, and both groups maintained pretransplant work pattern
Failed group significantly more satisfied with social support
Successful group perceived prior quality of life much lower than failed group did; outlook toward future quality of life somewhat more positive in successful group Among pancreas/kidney transplant recipients, those with a successful pancreas graft perceived significantly greater improvement in their health and quality of life than did those with a failed pancreas graft.
Long-term follow-up studies involving diabetic controls not desiring pancreas transplantation are required to more clearly identify impact of pancreas transplantation on quality of life.
Small patient sample
Subjective study Bentdal et al. (1991)
27 subjects
Retrospective study to assess rehabilitation and quality of life in successful and failed pancreas graft subjects Type I diabetics with ESRD prior to pancreas/ kidney transplantation, including 11 with both grafts functioning 
(Group A) and 16 with kidney graft functioning 
Higher, though not significant, need of help in Group 2 (25%) than in Group 1 (18%)
No differences between groups in rehabilitation, hospital admittance, or ability to work Though assessment of emotional and psychological factors may have shown other important differences between the groups, the higher incidence of post-transplant diabetic complications in the patients with failed pancreas graft emphasizes the importance of normalizing carbohydrate metabolism.
The authors suggest that performing pancreas/kidney transplantation at an earlier stage of diabetes prior to development of serious complications would result in improved rehabilitation and quality of life.
Small patient sample Secchi et al. (1991)
30 subjects
Retrospective study to assess quality of life in recipients of SPK or kidney alone transplantation Type I diabetics with uremia, including 17 patients with functioning pancreas and kidney grafts for 
(Group 1), and 13 patients with only a functioning kidney graft 
Method of questioning (interview or self-administered questionnaire) not specified Grp Grp
1 2
Feel ill 42% 89%
Health is problem: 32% 100%
Limited activity: 53% 78%
Improved health: 84% 77%
Social activity: 89% 56%
Hobbies: 58% 22%
Sports: 21% 33%
Work: 63% 44%
Can't work: 21% 33% Compared with diabetic patients who have a functioning kidney graft only, those with both functioning kidney and pancreas grafts experience a better quality of life, especially with respect to physical well-being and social life, while working capacity and physical activities were similar in both groups.
Pancreas transplantation results in improved quality of life in diabetic patients due to improved psychological performance.
Small patient sample
CONCLUSIONS: NET HEALTH OUTCOMES
In summary, findings of the studies regarding the effects of pancreas transplantation on health outcomes reveal the following:
* Although stabilization of retinopathy has been observed after pancreas transplantation, disease progression also has occurred.
It has not been clearly established that improved glucose control was responsible for the stabilization since laser coagulation was also used in most patients.
* Improvement in microcirculation has been observed following pancreas transplantation; however, there is question as to whether this improvement can be attributed solely to improved glucose control or if kidney transplantation or blood flow effects from immunosuppressants or other drugs may be responsible.
* Pancreas transplantation has resulted in minimal improvement in neuropathy and is reported to halt the progression of neuropathy and autonomic dysfunction.
* Pancreas transplantation has been reported to halt the progression of or prevent the appearance of diabetic nephropathy; however, evidence to support this is limited.
* Although findings from studies suggest that pancreas transplantation results in an improvement in quality of life, this evaluation has primarily been subjective.
* A number of investigators have suggested that performing pancreas transplantation earlier in the course of the disease prior to the appearance of irreversible lesions would result in greater improvement of secondary diabetic complications, stating that until that becomes the practice, little improvement should be expected.
Based upon this information, it is concluded that, with the exception of diabetic neuropathy, it has not been firmly established that pancreas transplantation has any beneficial effect on secondary diabetic complications or on quality of life.
Further well-designed large-scale studies are required to clarify these issues.
EVALUATION OF COST EFFECTIVENESS
In conjunction with the National Cooperative Transplantation Study, Evans et al. (1993b) analyzed data on transplantation procedure charges obtained from 66.7% of the 29 eligible centers that actively performed pancreas transplantation in 1988.
Sample data on no more than 25 patients per center were submitted for 133 randomly selected patients, which represented 54% of the pancreas transplantations performed in the United States that year.
The analyses focus only on charges incurred during the transplantation period itself and do not include pretransplantation evaluation and candidacy charges or post-transplantation charges following the initial discharge from the hospital.
Because they focus on charges and reimbursements since actual costs are not readily available, the terms cost and charges are used interchangeably.
In addition, the analyses are based upon the 101 pancreas transplants, including 84 simultaneous pancreas/kidney transplants, for which complete financial data were available.
Since little difference has been found in procedure charges and reimbursements for diabetics and nondiabetics, the cost of solitary kidney transplantation is included for comparison.
Because the range was considerable for each cost element, medians, rather than means, were used as a measure of central tendency.
These data are summarized in TABLE 16.
Analyses revealed that, although there was relatively little difference between charges for all pancreas transplantation procedures and those for simultaneous pancreas/kidney procedures, there was a marked difference between charges for solitary kidney transplantation and those for pancreas procedures, the differences being due to longer hospital stays and higher professional fees and organ acquisition charges.
The median total charge for a pancreas transplantation with or without a kidney was $66,917, with a hospital stay of about 21 days, as compared with a median total charge of $39,625 and a hospital stay of 14 days for solitary kidney transplantation.
For all pancreas procedures, hospital charges ranged from $11,074 for nine days of hospitalization to $515,792 for 132 days of hospitalization, with a median of $39,997; organ procurement charges ranged from $585 to $32,952, with a median of $15,400; surgeon fees ranged from $3,150 to $15,900, with a median of $8,697; and other professional fees ranged from $1,009 to $8,960, with a median of $2,823.
For 50% of the cases studied, total charges for pancreas transplantation ranged between $45,260 to $105,375 and hospitalization ranged between 16 days and 33 days (Evans et al., 1993b).
A considerable range in the level of reimbursement was also found but was favorable for those with private insurance coverage.
Reimbursement of hospital charges was 20% or less for 22.8% of the cases analyzed, 80% or less for 49.4% of the cases analyzed, and over 80% for 50.6% of the cases analyzed.
At least 66% of the cases for which reimbursement exceeded 80% had private insurance; whereas 75% of the cases for which reimbursement was less than 60% did not have private coverage.
The authors note that, due to the possibility of severe under-recovery of charges for potential transplant recipients without private health insurance,transplant programs may tend to transplant the privately insured patient over the uninsured patient; however, because actual hospital costs are not available and because charges generally bear little relationship to actual costs, the discrepancy between charges and reimbursements may not be the problem it appears to be.
Moreover, analysis of the primary source of payment revealed that multiple sources may combine to provide coverage of costs through a coordination of benefits similar to that used for kidney transplantation (Evans et al., 1993b).
About 50% of the pancreas transplantation procedures were paid for by Blue Cross and Blue Shield or other private or commercial insurance companies, and about 42.1% were paid by Medicare and Medicaid.
While Medicare technically does not pay for pancreas transplants, combined procedures may be billed as kidney only.
This was confirmed by a recent examination by Dr. Paul Eggers of the Health Care Financing Administration of 284 Medicare claims for kidney transplant that included a procedure with a code for pancreas transplant.
This analysis revealed that, in 1988, the Medicare charge for pancreas/kidney transplant was $65,308, less professional fees, which would be comparable to the charges reported herein without professional fees ($56,000), and the average length of hospital stay was 23 days, similar to that reported herein.
The Medicare charges include charges related to the pretransplantation period, and in 1988 the Medicare reimbursement-to-charge ratio was 63%.
It is clear that Medicare is paying for the hospital stay in which the pancreas transplantation occurs but not for the portion of the stay that is related to the pancreas transplant (Evans et al., 1993b).
Evans and colleagues (1993b) assert that the sustained increase in the number of pancreas procedures performed each year may be a function of insurance coverage even though the procedure is regarded as investigational by many physicians and surgeons.
The authors suggest that as the procedure gains more acceptance, charges may increase as a result of billing for services that are now provided without charge and insurers may limit coverage to assure they do not excessively bear the economic burden of pancreas transplantation.
TABLE 16
MEDIAN PANCREAS AND KIDNEY TRANSPLANTATION CHARGES
Element of Cost
All Pancreas Procedures
Simultaneous Pancreas/Kidney
Kidney Only
Hospital Charges
$ 39,997
$ 38,288
$ 21,214
Professional Fees
Surgeon
Other
$ 8,697
$ 2,823
$ 8,704
$ 2,823
$ 4.078
$ 2.043.
Donor Organ Acquisition
$ 15,400.
$ 17,600.
$ 12,290.
Total Charges
$ 66,917.
$ 67,415.
$ 39,625.
* Evans et al., 1993b.
TABLE 17 provides Minnesota-specific data regarding the average charges for pancreas/kidney transplantation procedures and solitary cadaveric kidney transplantation performed by the University of Minnesota Hospital and Clinic between July, 1990 to June, 1991.
The figures reflect total charges, including pretransplant evaluation and maintenance care charges, transplantation charges, organ acquisition charges, professional fees, and charges for care up to one year post-transplantation.
The charge for organ acquisition alone was $26,600 for six of the kidney/pancreas procedures and $42,100 for 16 of these procedures, while it was $22,800 for all solitary kidney procedures.
The total charges for the time frame amounted to $4,151,875 for pancreas/kidney transplantation and $3,011,074 for solitary kidney transplantation.
TABLE 17
PANCREAS/KIDNEY AND SOLITARY KIDNEY TRANSPLANTATION CHARGES
University of Minnesota Hospital and Clinic
Pancreas/Kidney Transplant (22)
Solitary Kidney Transplant (21)
Charges
Organ Acquisition Charge
All Other Charges
Total Charge
Organ Acquisition Charge
All Other Charges
Total Charge Lowest $ 26,600 $ 60,175 $ 86,775 $ 22,800 $ 19,200 $ 42,000 Highest $ 42,100 $362,265 $404,365 $ 22,800 $319,218 $342,018 Average $ 42,100 Unspecified $188,722 $ 22,800 Unspecified $143,384
According to the Institute for Clinical Systems Integration (ICSI), total first-year post-transplant charges range from $51,000 to $135,000 and average about $70,000.
In addition, the yearly cost of immunosuppression ranges from $4,000 to $6,000 (ICSI, 1994).
The yearly costs per patient for diabetes and for dialysis amount to over $3,000 and $30,000, respectively (Bartucci et al., 1992).
The cost of an insulin pump for intensive insulin therapy is about $5,000.
Catheters, syringes, etc. average about $75 per month, and a bottle of insulin costs about $10 and may be required once or twice a month; thus, the first year cost of therapy would be less than $7,000 while thereafter it would be less than $1,200 per year (ICSI, 1994).
These figures do not take into account the costs of treatment or hospitalization for primary or secondary diabetic complications, which could not be found in the available literature.
CONCLUSIONS: COST EFFECTIVENESS
While it appears that the costs of pancreas transplantation far exceed those of insulin therapy, no data are available regarding average yearly costs for treatment or hospitalization for primary or secondary complications among patients with exogenous insulin therapy.
Moreover, no controlled studies have compared health outcomes between those on insulin therapy and pancreas recipients and no information could be found related to quality years of life saved.
Until all this information is available, it is difficult to draw conclusions regarding the cost effectiveness of pancreas transplantation in comparison to that of insulin therapy.
When comparing the overall costs of combined pancreas/kidney transplantation procedures with kidney transplantation alone and insulin therapy or dialysis and insulin therapy, the lon-term differences in cost between the three options become far less pronounced.
However, until data are available comparing health outcomes and evaluating quality years of life saved for each of these options, conclusions cannot be drawn regarding the cost effectiveness of pancreas transplantation.
OTHER CONSIDERATIONS Criteria for Reimbursement
In an attempt to assure high-quality patient care and to contain costs, several insurance providers have adopted specific standards that restrict payment of transplantation procedures to particular transplantation centers.
These centers are designated "centers of excellence" based upon annual volume of transplants, outcomes (particularly one-year and two-year patient and graft survival rates), and hypothetical interrelationships among volume, outcomes, and costs.
Because of the assumption that high-volume centers have better outcomes than low-volume centers, many organizations, such as Medicare, the Civilian Health and Medical Programs of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS), and the National Task Force on Organ Transplantation, have developed criteria requiring that a particular number of transplantation procedures be performed annually by a center to qualify for reimbursement.
The criteria vary among insurers, with some specifying overall program numbers, some specifying separate numbers for adult and pediatric procedures, and all specifying different numbers for different transplantation procedures.
Moreover, it is argued that high-volume transplantation centers can provide procedures at a cost substantially lower than that of low-volume centers, and some insurers claim that certain transplantation centers have offered discounts.
Many insurers have also set minimum requirements regarding acceptable survival rates, again with a variety of different rates suggested or established by different insurers and separate rates for pediatric procedures, simultaneous or sequential procedures, and indications for transplantation (Evans, 1992).
This has raised some concern among transplant professionals and hospital administrators who feel that these standards unnecessarily limit patient access to transplantation and patient choice of providers.
For example, the initial volume requirement would prevent experienced surgeons from establishing a qualified program since reimbursement would not be available, and hospitals may be unwilling or unable to underwrite the costs of transplantations to reach a volume acceptable to insurers.
Further, the average number of transplantation procedures performed in any center annually is small, and the minimum volume requirement would disqualify many transplantation centers from reimbursement.
Many experts also feel that the minimum survival requirement not only would place centers transplanting complex cases at a disadvantage if limits are set too high but also would discourage the transplantation of complex cases and limit innovation in transplantation (Evans, 1992).
In addition, it is thought that inconsistencies between the criteria used by the United Network for Organ Sharing (UNOS) and the criteria used by insurers to designate transplantation centers, "may severely compromise the provision of transplantation services and undermine efforts to enhance donor organ supply" (page 1045).
UNOS, the organization responsible for certifying qualified solid organ transplantation providers, also uses a volume requirement, with the exception of heart transplantation; however, this volume is required by the individual surgeon or physician rather than the center.
UNOS criteria allows that credentials may be attained through training coupled with experience or experience alone and specifies that, for each transplantation program, at least one transplantation surgeon and one transplantation physician must meet the volume and/or training requirement.
Any program not meeting this requirement cannot access organs through the Organ Procurement and Transplantation Network (OPTN), and any hospital not qualifying but still performing transplantations risks losing eligibility to participate in the Medicare program.
With the UNOS criteria, qualified surgeons and physicians can move from one hospital to another, and if other criteria are met, can easily qualify for participation in OPTN.
UNOS guidelines also do not specify minimum survival rates, except for heart transplantation, but instead allow for an evaluation and a period of probation for centers with low survival rates to determine if the low rate may be accounted for by plausible causes, such as an adverse case-mix, and to remedy situations in which established policies and practices have not been followed (Evans, 1992).
It has also been emphasized that the costs of transplantation have not been studied on a large scale, making it difficult to reach any conclusion regarding the volume-cost theory.
Moreover, insurers should be wary about the procedures used for discounting since it is often difficult to distinguish between actual transplantation costs and patient charges.
With little information on actual costs, savings cannot be assessed, and it has been suggested that offered discounts may be based on artificially inflated procedure charges.
In conclusion, insurers' demands for cost-effective transplantation services are generally thought to be reasonable, especially when considering the public's demand for more medical care coupled with its unwillingness to pay for the care desired.
However, if enforcement of the reimbursement criteria causes otherwise qualified programs to become inactive, it is possible that the number of designated transplantation centers may become too small to accommodate the demand for transplantation, which ultimately could result in higher transplantation costs (Evans, 1992).
Although the cost of organ procurement amounts to between 9% and 31% of the total transplant procedure, there has been a wide variation in costs submitted for acquisition of each organ.
The reasons for the diversity of costs are unclear.
It has been suggested that data on actual costs are required to determine the appropriateness of current charges and that billing and payment methods be reevaluated, addressing several issues related to reimbursement (Evans, 1993a).
REFERENCES
1.
Abecassis M, Corry RJ.
An update on pancreas transplantation.
Advances in Surgery.
1993;26:163-185.
2.
Abendroth D, Schmand J, Landgraf R, et al.
Diabetic microangiopathy in Type I (insulin-dependent) diabetic patients after successful pancreatic and kidney or solitary kidney transplantation.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S131-S134.
3.
Agency for Health Care Policy Research (AHCPR).
Simultaneous pancreas-kidney and sequential pancreas-after-kidney transplantation.
Health Technology Assessment.
Publication number 95-0065.
August 1995.
4.
Allen DB, MacDonald MJ. Pancreas and islet cell transplantation for Type I diabetes mellitus: Does it have a role for children? Adv Pediatr.
1990;37:391-412.
5.
American Diabetes Association.
Implications of the Diabetes Control and Complications Trial.
Position Statement.
American Diabetes Association, National Service Center, 1660 Duke Street, Alexandria, VA 22311; June 1993.
6.
American Diabetes Association.
Pancreas transplantation for patients with diabetes mellitus.
Position Statement.
Diabetes Care.
1992a;15:1673.
7.
American Diabetes Association.
Pancreas transplantation for patients with diabetes mellitus.
Technical Review.
Diabetes Care.
1992b;15:1668-1672.
8.
Bandello F, Vigano C, Secchi A, et al.
Effect of pancreas transplantation on diabetic retinopathy: a 20-case report.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S92-S94.
9.
Bartucci MR, Loughman KA, Moir EJ. Kidney-pancreas transplantation: A treatment option for ESRD and Type I diabetes.
ANNA J. 1992;19:467-474.
10.
Bentdal OH, Fauchald P, Brekke IB, et al.
Rehabilitation and quality of life in diabetic patients after successful pancreas-kidney transplantation.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S158-S159.
11.
Bilous RW, Mauer SM, Sutherland DER, et al.
The effects of pancreas transplantation on the glomerular structure of renal allografts in patients with insulin-dependent diabetes.
N Engl J Med. 1989;321:80-85.
12.
Boucek P, Barto V, Vank I, et al.
Diabetic autonomic neuropathy after pancreas and kidney transplantation.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S121-S124.
13.
Boudreaux JP, Nealon WH, Carson RC, Fish JC. Pancreas transplantation: a new program.
The Am Surgeon.
1991;57:114-117.
14.
Brekke IB. Indications and results of pancreatic transplantation: the Oslo experience 1983-1990.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S18-S20.
15.
Brown E. Pancreatic transplantations.
Diagnostic and Therapeutic Technology Assessment (DATTA); American Medical Association; November 14, 1990.
16.
Cheung AHS, Matas AJ, Gruessner RG, et al.
Should uremic diabetic patients who want a pancreas transplant receive a simultaneous cadaver kidney-pancreas transplant or a living related donor kidney first followed by cadaver pancreas transplant? Transplantation Proceedings.
1993;25:1184-1185.
17.
Cheung AHS, Sutherland DER, Gillingham KJ, et al.
Simultaneous pancreas-kidney transplant versus kidney transplant alone in diabetic patients.
Kidney International.
1992;41:924-929.
18.
Comi G, Galardi G, Amadio S, et al.
Neurophysiological study of the effect of combined kidney and pancreas transplantation on diabetic neuropathy: a 2-year follow-up evaluation.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S103-S107.
19.
Di Carlo V, Staudacher C, Cristallo M, et al.
Pancreas and kidney transplantation: the San Raffaele Hospital (Milan, Italy) experience.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S11-S13.
20.
Esmatjes E, Fernandez-Cruz L, Ricart MJ, et al.
Metabolic characteristics in patients with long-term pancreas graft with systemic or portal venous drainage.
Diabetalogia.
1991;34:S40-S43.
Evans RW.
Public and private insurer designation of transplantation programs.
Transplantation.
1992;53(5):1041-1046.
21.
Evans RW. Organ procurement expenditures and the role of financial incentives.
JAMA. 1993a;269(24):3113-3118.
22.
Evans RW, Manninen DL, Dong FB.
An economic analysis of pancreas transplantation: Costs, insurance coverage, and reimbursement.
Clin Transplantation.
1993b;7:166-174.
23.
Goetz FC, Moudry-Munns K, Sutherland DER.
Whole-organ pancreas transplantation in the 1990s.
Clinical Diabetes.
1991;9:1,36-41.
24.
Golden MP, Orr DP. Labile diabetes and pancreatic transplantation [letter to the editor].
Diabetes Care.
1989;12:512-513.
25.
Grewal HP, Garland L, Kovak K, et al.
Risk factors for postimplantation pancreatitis and pancreatic thrombosis in pancreas recipients.
Transplantation.
1993;56:609-612.
26.
Gruessner RWG, Dunn DL, Gruessner AC, et al.
Recipient risk factors have an impact on technical failure and patient and graft survival rates in bladder-drained pancreas transplants.
Transplantation.
1994;57:1598-1606.
27.
Grundfest-Broniatowski S. Pancreas transplantation: state of the art.
Cleveland Clin J Med. 1990;57:564-570.
28.
Hillebrand G, Illner WD, Abendroth D, et al.
Outcome of renal grafts after simultaneous kidney/pancreas transplantation.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S16-S17.
29.
Hopt UT, Büsing M, Schareck WD, Becker HD.
The bladder drainage technique in pancreas transplantation - the Tübingen experience.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S24-S27.
30.
Hostetter TH. Mechanisms of diabetic nephropathy.
Am J Kidney Diseases.
1994;23:188-192.
31.
Illner WD, Abendroth D, Nusser J, et al.
Long-term results in pancreatic transplantation with special emphasis on the use of prolamine.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S14-S15.
32.
Institute of Clinical Systems Integration.
Technology Assessment.
Pancreas Transplantation.
1994.
33.
Jörneskog G, Tydén G, Bolinder J, Fagrell B. Skin microvascular reactivity in fingers of diabetic patients after combined kidney and pancreas transplantation.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S135-S137.
34.
Königsrainer A, Miller K, Steurer W, et al.
Does pancreas transplantation influence the course of diabetic retinopathy? Diabetologia.
1991a;34:S86-S88.
35.
Königsrainer A, Steurer W, Aichberger C, et al.
Pancreatic transplantation with delayed duct occlusion versus bladder drainage: long-term results.
Diabetologia.
1991b;34:S4-S7.
36.
Martin X, Lefrancois N, Marechal JM, et al.
Pancreas transplantation in Lyon: overall results.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S8-S10.
37.
Milde FK, Hart LK, Zehr PS.
Quality of life of pancreatic transplant recipients.
Diabetes Care.
1992;15:1459-1463.
38.
Morel P, Chau C, Brayman K, et al.
Quality of metabolic control at 2 to 12 years after pancreas transplant.
Transplantation Proceedings.
1992;24:835-838.
39.
Müller-Felber W, Landgraf R, Wagner St, et al.
Follow-up study of sensory-motor polyneuropathy in Type 1 (insulin-dependent) diabetic subjects after simultaneous pancreas and kidney transplantation and after graft rejection.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S113-S117.
40.
Navarro X, Kennedy WR, Sutherland DER.
Autonomic neuropathy and survival in diabetes mellitus: effects of pancreas transplantation.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S108-S112.
41.
Nusser J, Scheuer R, Abendroth D, et al.
Effect of pancreatic and/or renal transplantation on diabetic autonomic neuropathy.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S118-S120.
42.
Nyberg G, Bech-Hanssen O, Olausson M, Wallentin I. Echocardiographic findings in kidney transplanted Type I (insulin-dependent) diabetic patients with and without a pancreas transplant.
Diabetologia.
1991a;34:S128-S130.
43.
Nyberg G, Fager G, Mjörnstedt L, Olausson M. Metabolic risk factors for cardiovascular disease in pancreas and kidney transplant recipients.
Diabetologia.
1991b;34:S44-S46.
44.
Ozaki CF, Stratta RJ, Taylor RJ, et al.
Surgical complications in solitary pancreas and combined pancreas-kidney transplantations.
Am J Surg. 1992;164:545-550.
45.
Physicians' Desk Reference (PDR), 50th ed. Montvale, NJ: Medical Economics Data; 1995; p. 1042-1045, 1110-1112, 1787-1788, 1837-1841, 2286-2290, 2581-2583, 2615-2617, 2725-2730.
46.
Piehlmeier W, Bullinger M, Nusser J, et al.
Quality of life in Type I (insulin-dependent) diabetic patients prior to and after pancreas and kidney transplantation in relation to organ function.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S150-S157.
47.
Remuzzi G, Ruggenenti P, Mauer SM. Pancreas and kidney/pancreas transplants: experimental medicine or real improvement? Lancet.
1994;343:27-31.
48.
Robertson RP, Sutherland DER.
Pancreas transplantation as therapy for diabetes mellitus.
Annual Review of Medicine.
1992;43:395-415.
49.
Roesler J. Minnesota Diabetes Surveillance Project.
1989.
50.
Scheider A, Meyer-Schwickerath E, Nusser J, et al.
Diabetic retinopathy and pancreas transplantation: a 3-year follow-up.
Diabetologia.
1991;34;S95-S99.
51.
Schwartz SI, Shires GT, Spencer FC (eds.).
Principles of Surgery, Fifth Edition.
McGraw-Hill Book Company: New York, NY, etc.; 1989; p. 394-439.
52.
Secchi A, Di Carlo V, Martinenghi S, et al.
Effect of pancreas transplantation on life expectancy, kidney function and quality of life in uraemic Type I (insulin-dependent) diabetic patients.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S141-S144.
53.
Sollinger HW, Ploeg RJ, Eckhoff DE, et al.
Two hundred consecutive simultaneous pancreas-kidney transplants with bladder drainage.
Surgery.
1993;114:736-744.
54.
Stratta RJ, Taylor RJ, Ozaki CF, et al.
The analysis of benefit and risk of combined pancreatic and renal transplantation versus renal transplantation alone.
Surg, Gynecolog 
1993a;177:163-171.
55.
Stratta RJ, Taylor RJ, Wahl TO, et al.
Recipient selection and evaluation for vascularized pancreas transplantation.
Transplantation.
1993b;55:1090-1096.
56.
Sutherland DER.
Effect of pancreas transplants on secondary complications of diabetes: Review of observations at a single institution.
Transplantation Proceedings.
1992;24:859-860.
57.
Sutherland DER.
State of the art in pancreas transplantation.
Transplantation Proceedings.
1994;26:316-320.
58.
Sutherland DER, Gores PF, Farney AC, et al.
Evolution of kidney, pancreas, and islet transplantation for patients with diabetes at the University of Minnesota.
Am J Surg. 1993a;166:456-491.
59.
Sutherland DER, Gruessner RW, Moudry-Munns, et al.
Pancreas transplants alone in nonuremic patients with labile diabetes.
Transplantation Proceedings.
1994;26:446-447.
60.
Sutherland DER, Moudry-Munns K, Gruessner A, .
Pancreas transplant results in United Network for Organ Sharing (UNOS) United States of America (USA) Registry with a comparison to non-USA data in the International Registry.
Clinical Transplants 1993, Terasaki and Cecka, Eds. UCLA Tissue Typing Laboratory, Los Angelos, CA; 1993b;47-69.
61.
Taylor RJ, Bynon JS, Stratta RJ. Kidney/pancreas transplantation: a review of the current status.
Urologic Clinics of North America.
1994;21:343-354.
62.
Tydén G, Tibell A, Bolinder J, et al.
The Stockholm experience with pancreatic transplantation using enteric exocrine diversion.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S21-S23.
63.
United States Renal Data System (USRDS).
VIII.
Simultaneous kidney-pancreas transplantation versus kidney transplantation alone: patient survival, kidney graft survival, and post-transplant hospitalization.
Am J Kidney Diseases.
1992;XX:61-67.
64.
Vial C, Martin X, Lefrancois N, et al.
Sequential electrodiagnostic evaluation of diabetic neuropathy after combined pancreatic and renal transplantation.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S100-S102.
65.
Vinek AI, Dafoe DC.
Labile diabetes and pancreatic transplantation [letter to the editor].
Diabetes Care.
1989;12:513-514.
66.
Zech JC, Trepsat D, Gain-Gueugnon M, et al.
Ophthalmological follow-up of Type I (insulin-dependent) diabetic patients after kidney and pancreas transplantation.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S89-S91.
67.
Zehrer CL, Gross CR. Quality of life of pancreas transplant recipients.
Diabetologia.
1991;34:S145-S149.
APPENDIX I
PUBLIC COMMENTS ON PRELIMINARY REPORT
A preliminary version of this report was released for public
